

	
        
    

    Gardner Business Media :


        Gardner Web
    




















Ad Central | 
Login | 
Payments




About Us
Media
Events
Research
Marketing Blog
Economic News
Press









 







 











METALWORKING
Modern Machine Shop
Modern Machine Shop Mexico
Production Machining
MoldMaking Technology
Additive Manufacturing
Techspex
PLASTICS & COMPOSITES
Plastics Technology
Plastics Technology Mexico
CompositesWorld
MoldMaking Technology
Additive Manufacturing
AUTOMOTIVE
Automotive Design and Production
AutoBeat Daily
FINISHING
Products Finishing

Map Your Show






MANUFACTURING
            Insider's Blog



                Three Strategic Marketing and Sales Mistakes to Avoid in 2017

To reach your company’s 2017 revenue goals, it's a good idea to keep your eye on a few key strategic areas. The following three, as discussed in MarketingProfs, when ignored, become some of the most common mistakes that lead to panic attack.
Recent Posts
Three Strategic Marketing and Sales Mistakes to Avoid in 2017

From the Age of Reason to the Age of Feeling

How Artificial Intelligence is Transforming B2B Marketing

+ More




                GARDNER RESEARCH
            
            Market Reports
        


            This is the 51th edition of an independent annual survey that collects statistics from machine-tool-producing countries and compares them in U.S. dollars.
+ More


            Gardner’s Capital Spending Survey is the largest, most comprehensive survey detailing future spending in the durable goods manufacturing industries.
+ More


            Now in its fifth year, the results of our annual media survey reveal the demographic characteristics and media usage trends of today’s manufacturing technology buyer.
+ More

View All Gardner Research Reports




MANUFACTURING
            Economic News

Income Growth Revised Significantly Lower
Annual growth in real disposable income decelerated to its slowest rate since August 2014.

+ More

July GBI: 54.4
In the year-to-date and one-year ago periods, the Business Index is up 7.6 percent and 17.8 percent respectively.

+ More

Housing Permit Growth Accelerates
            June 2017 permits were the highest since June 2015.
+ More
See more Manufacturing Economic News






Home
About GBMI
Events
Research
Marketing Blog
Economic Blog
Press
Ad Central
Upload
Login
Payments
Careers




Modern Machine Shop
Production Machining
MoldMaking Technology
Automotive Design and Production
Plastics Technology
Products Finishing
Composites World
Techspex
Map Your Show




      		6915 Valley Avenue
	  		Cincinnati, OH 45244-3029
	  		Phone: 513.527.8800
	  		Fax: 513.527.8801
    		


















GroupM | World’s largest media investment group
























 Toggle navigation    
  





Search form
Search

























The world’s leader in media delivering unrivaled marketing advantage.
GroupM is the world’s largest media investment group with more than $102bn billings (RECMA, 2016). We’re responsible for one in three ads globally.


ABOUT







A global powerhouse
GroupM is a global, regional and local powerhouse with over 27,500 employees in 400 offices worldwide, offering unrivaled data, media and technology services.


CONTACT







Creators and owners of technology.
GroupM’s owned and operated proprietary technologies are the leading edge of marketing business science, driving insights that create competitive advantage.


TECHNOLOGY































GroupM in the News








August 3, 2017





GroupM Names New CEO in Korea  





Korea


Leadership


Talent























GroupM in the News








July 31, 2017





GroupM's Irwin Gotlieb Talks "Brand Building Deficit" w...





Irwin Gotlieb


brands


Marketing























GroupM in the News








July 27, 2017





GroupM China Releases Mother and Child Survey Report





China


mothers


parents


Mobile














Please fill in the below information to receive a copy of the report.


Name: 
Title: 
Company: 
Email: 




Submit


Cancel


























Why not join the world’s leading media investment group?
Explore available opportunities to work for a cutting edge, technologically advanced company that focuses on media in all of its forms.

talent
























Facebook Business：Facebook 行銷











在 Facebook for Business 上搜尋相關資源支援Facebook 行銷產業類別激發靈感最新消息刊登廣告建立粉絲專頁行銷目標透過 Facebook 達成所有業務目標打造據點打響知名度增加曝光率開發潛在顧客衝高銷售業績培養顧客忠誠度粉絲專頁建立和管理網路業務據點開始使用粉絲專頁設立粉絲專頁管理 Facebook 粉絲專頁推廣粉絲專頁建立及加強推廣 Facebook 貼文粉絲專頁的訊息功能粉絲專頁洞察報告廣告觸及重要用戶開始刊登廣告購買 Facebook 廣告廣告格式廣告版位選擇廣告受眾管理廣告廣告刊登祕訣廣告指南Instagram利用生動影像包裝品牌故事的吸睛之道Messenger透過用戶慣用的裝置與平台和他們互動Audience Network拓展行銷活動的觸及範圍成效衡量運用以人為本的工具，全面剖析成果衡量廣告成效金融服務業零售與電子商務業遊戲業娛樂與媒體業電信業科技業消費性商品業政治汽車業餐飲業成功案例看看其他 Facebook 商家的做法活動取得主要產業活動的重點整理、焦點內容和前導預告廣告創意中心欣賞廣告創意範例，建立您自己的廣告樣稿行銷目標透過 Facebook 達成所有業務目標打造據點打響知名度增加曝光率開發潛在顧客衝高銷售業績培養顧客忠誠度粉絲專頁建立和管理網路業務據點開始使用粉絲專頁設立粉絲專頁管理 Facebook 粉絲專頁推廣粉絲專頁建立及加強推廣 Facebook 貼文粉絲專頁的訊息功能粉絲專頁洞察報告廣告觸及重要用戶開始刊登廣告購買 Facebook 廣告廣告格式廣告版位選擇廣告受眾管理廣告廣告刊登祕訣廣告指南Instagram利用生動影像包裝品牌故事的吸睛之道Messenger透過用戶慣用的裝置與平台和他們互動Audience Network拓展行銷活動的觸及範圍成效衡量運用以人為本的工具，全面剖析成果衡量廣告成效金融服務業零售與電子商務業遊戲業娛樂與媒體業電信業科技業消費性商品業政治汽車業餐飲業成功案例看看其他 Facebook 商家的做法活動取得主要產業活動的重點整理、焦點內容和前導預告廣告創意中心欣賞廣告創意範例，建立您自己的廣告樣稿在 Facebook for Business 上搜尋開啟側邊導覽功能表關閉側邊導覽功能表Facebook 行銷展開導覽標題收合導覽標題行銷目標粉絲專頁廣告InstagramMessengerAudience Network成效衡量產業類別展開導覽標題收合導覽標題金融服務業零售與電子商務業遊戲業娛樂與媒體業電信業科技業消費性商品業政治汽車業餐飲業激發靈感展開導覽標題收合導覽標題成功案例活動廣告創意中心最新消息相關資源支援刊登廣告建立粉絲專頁與用戶聯繫交流，拓展業務規模瞭解廣告刊登廣告想瞭解詳情？點擊或點按加號圖示，深入瞭解 Facebook 提供的一系列應用程式和服務如何協助您觸及更多用戶、提升銷售量及拓展業務。刊登廣告建立粉絲專頁open section draweropen section drawer (hover state)數以百萬的大型企業和中小商家皆選擇運用 Facebook 旗下的應用程式和服務，與各種裝置上的真實用戶建立聯繫。FACEBOOK商家的專屬空間Facebook 粉絲專頁能協助用戶與您的商家建立聯繫。Facebook 廣告則可讓用戶深入探索您所提供的產品或服務。新手指南INSTAGRAM激發無限靈感的聯繫平台您的商家可以在 Instagram 使用相片、影片及廣告激發觀眾的靈感、打響品牌知名度，以及吸引用戶採取行動。新手指南小美，你好，你的訂單已經出貨了！ 大約會在星期一送達。你好，我剛剛收到安全帽，但我訂的尺寸不對，想要換貨。當然可以！ 我已經將預付郵資的退貨標籤寄到你的電子郵件地址。你想要更改為什麼尺寸？中尺寸，謝謝。好的，收到退回的安全帽後，我們便會盡快出貨。太好了，謝謝！小美，不用客氣！我超喜歡這頂新安全帽！ 戴起來又輕又舒服！太感謝你了！小美，你太客氣了！ 如果你向朋友推薦我們的產品，我們會提供推薦人折扣，讓你下次購物時使用！MESSENGER溝通交流，順暢無阻Messenger 可讓您運用簡訊的各項優勢，為用戶提供極為實用的服務。新手指南Audience Network提高行銷活動觸及人數Audience Network 有助於將行銷活動擴展至 Facebook 以外的網路空間，讓您在更多地方投遞廣告、觸及更多您重視的客群。新手指南適用於各種目標每個商家都各不相同，因此 Facebook 設計了一系列應用程式和服務，以協助您的商家成功達成理想目標。 打響品牌知名度傳達品牌故事不論是為商家還是新產品提升知名度，我們的品牌知名度工具都可以讓用戶深入瞭解您最重視的特點。瞭解詳情提高流量、互動次數及銷售量吸引用戶採取行動鼓勵用戶瀏覽網站或造訪商家、下載您的應用程式，或是購買產品。瞭解詳情衡量廣告成效衡量廣告成效制定更完善的決策您可以使用我們的衡量工具查看行銷活動成效與原定目標之間的差距，好在往後建立更完善的行銷活動。瞭解詳情觸動視覺感官，傳達品牌故事我們有吸睛的廣告格式，能成功抓住用戶目光、鼓勵他們採取行動。這些廣告格式不但靈活彈性、能在各種裝置上呈現最佳效果，而且能助您達成業務目標。深入瞭解廣告格式輕影片輕鬆製作，內容吸睛輕影片廣告運用一系列靜態圖像製作；用戶只要具備無線網路連線，便可快速載入影片，享受順暢的播放效果。瞭解詳情刊登廣告影片聲色俱全，令人動容Facebook 影片廣告專為動態消息而設計，不但能迅速載入，還能自動播放，透過視覺、聽覺及動態元素，讓行動用戶充分感受廣告魅力。瞭解詳情刊登廣告發生錯誤播放此影片時發生問題。瞭解詳情全螢幕互動廣告專為行動裝置而生，讓您放膽玩創意全螢幕互動廣告可呈現影片、文字、圖像與各式各樣的創新內容。無論您的品牌故事為何，全螢幕互動廣告都能幫助您生動傳達故事，針對行動裝置打造出色廣告，提供快速載入的體驗。瞭解詳情刊登廣告FACEBOOK BUSINESS 最新消息獲得一切最新資訊新媒體，新標準：影片廣告走入行動時代2017年7月20日創新大賞「網路與實體銷售」優勝者出爐2017年5月11日打造深入人心的品牌：運用影片廣告2017年4月12日與 Facebook + TV 攜手共創多螢未來成功案例數百萬的商家都選擇使用 Facebook。快來看看他們的成功故事。香港國泰航空86 ShopGM99GOMAJI Taiwan所有成功案例再次鎖定飛行常客一探究竟創意影片吸引新客 快速擴展品牌知名度一探究竟裝備好自己　迎接遊戲世界的挑戰一探究竟人性化行銷漏斗方案 將效益最大化一探究竟Facebook Blueprint使用 Facebook，行銷一手搞定您可以透過 Facebook Blueprint 免費參加網路學習課程和網路研討會，自行學習如何透過 Facebook 和 Instagram 達成各種業務目標，或是進一步成為 Facebook 認證的行銷專家。瞭解詳情FACEBOOK IQ掌握對您業務至關重要的行銷分析數據Facebook IQ 對 20 億用戶進行行為研究，提供您強大的消費者分析數據和廣告分析數據。立即開始打造更有效的行銷活動。查看洞察報告立即與顧客建立聯繫。刊登廣告建立粉絲專頁我們提供完善的應用程式與服務陣容，讓企業和用戶透過各種方式建立聯繫。FacebookInstagramMessengerAudience NetworkWorkplace你覺得這個頁面多有幫助？不論您的企業規模大小，Facebook 均可助您拓展業務。前往 Facebook Business 專頁，查看和廣告主有關的最新消息以及其他資訊。Facebook 行銷成功案例成效衡量產業類別激發靈感活動最新消息網站地圖行銷目標打造據點打響知名度增加曝光率開發潛在顧客衝高銷售業績培養顧客忠誠度Facebook 粉絲專頁開始使用粉絲專頁設立粉絲專頁管理 Facebook 粉絲專頁推廣粉絲專頁建立及加強推廣 Facebook 貼文粉絲專頁的訊息功能粉絲專頁洞察報告Facebook 廣告開始刊登廣告購買 Facebook 廣告廣告格式廣告版位選擇廣告受眾衡量廣告成效管理廣告廣告刊登祕訣相關資源廣告指南廣告主使用說明Audience Network互助論壇支援Facebook BlueprintFacebook for DevelopersFacebook IQFacebook 行銷合作夥伴Instagram Business瀏覽我們的 Facebook 粉絲專頁中文(台灣)English (US)English (UK)EspañolPortuguês (Brasil)Français (France)更多語言English (US)English (UK)EspañolEspañol (España)DeutschFrançais (France)日本語ItalianoPortuguês (Brasil)한국어ภาษาไทยTiếng Việt中文(简体)العربيةTürkçeРусскийNederlandsPolskiČeštinaDanskΕλληνικάSuomiעבריתहिन्दीMagyarBahasa IndonesiaNorsk (bokmål)Português (Portugal)RomânăSvenska中文(香港)Français (Canada)Bahasa Melayu Facebook © 2017關於開發人員工作機會隱私政策Cookie使用條款使用說明









 



Advertising - Wikipedia






















 







Advertising

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 30 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For advertising in Wikipedia articles, see Wikipedia:Spam. For proposal on advertising about Wikipedia, see Wikipedia:Advertisements.
"Ad", "Advertiser", and "Adverts" redirect here. For the English punk band, see The Adverts. For other uses, see AD (disambiguation) and Advertiser (disambiguation).




A Coca-Cola advertisement from the 1890s




Marketing




Marketing
Marketing management






Key concepts


Product marketing
Pricing
Distribution
Service
Retail
Brand management
Brand licensing
Co-creation
Account-based marketing
Ethics
Effectiveness
Research
Segmentation
Strategy
Activation
Management
Dominance
Marketing operations
Social marketing
Identity
Digital marketing
Promotion








Promotional content


Advertising
Branding
Underwriting spot
Direct marketing
Personal selling
Product placement
Propaganda
Publicity
Sales promotion
Sex in advertising
Loyalty marketing
Mobile marketing
Premiums
Prizes
Corporate anniversary
On-hold messaging








Promotional media


Printing
Publication
Broadcasting
Out-of-home advertising
Internet
Display advertising
Behavioral targeting
Web banner
Point of sale
Merchandise
In-game advertising
Mobile advertising
Native advertising
Product demonstration
Word-of-mouth
Brand ambassador
Drip marketing
Visual merchandising
New media









v
t
e





Advertising is an audio or visual form of marketing communication that employs an openly sponsored, nonpersonal message to promote or sell a product, service or idea.[1]:465 Sponsors of advertising are often businesses who wish to promote their products or services. Advertising is differentiated from public relations in that an advertiser usually pays for and has control over the message. It is differentiated from personal selling in that the message is nonpersonal, i.e., not directed to a particular individual.[1]:661,672 Advertising is communicated through various mass media,[2] including old media such as newspapers, magazines, Television, Radio, outdoor advertising or direct mail; or new media such as search results, blogs, websites or text messages. The actual presentation of the message in a medium is referred to as an advertisement or "ad".
Commercial ads often seek to generate increased consumption of their products or services through "branding," which associates a product name or image with certain qualities in the minds of consumers. On the other hand, ads that intend to elicit an immediate sale are known as direct response advertising. Non-commercial advertisers who spend money to advertise items other than a consumer product or service include political parties, interest groups, religious organizations and governmental agencies. Non-profit organizations may use free modes of persuasion, such as a public service announcement. Advertising may also be used to reassure employees or shareholders that a company is viable or successful.
Modern advertising was created with the techniques introduced with tobacco advertising in the 1920s, most significantly with the campaigns of Edward Bernays, considered the founder of modern, "Madison Avenue" advertising.[3][4]
In 2015, the world spent an estimate of US$529.43 billion on advertising.[5] Its projected distribution for 2017 is 40.4% on TV, 33.3% on digital, 9% on newspapers, 6.9% on magazines, 5.8% on outdoor and 4.3% on radio.[6] Internationally, the largest ("big four") advertising conglomerates are Interpublic, Omnicom, Publicis, and WPP.[7]
In Latin, ad vertere means "to turn toward".[8]



Contents


1 History

1.1 19th century
1.2 20th century

1.2.1 On the radio from the 1920s
1.2.2 Commercial television in the 1950s
1.2.3 Cable television from the 1980s
1.2.4 On the Internet from the 1990s




2 Classification

2.1 Traditional media
2.2 New media and advertising approaches
2.3 Rise in new media
2.4 Niche marketing
2.5 Crowdsourcing
2.6 Global advertising
2.7 Foreign public messaging
2.8 Diversification
2.9 New technology
2.10 Advertising education


3 Purposes

3.1 Sales promotions and brand loyalty


4 Criticisms
5 Regulation
6 Theory

6.1 Hierarchy-of-effects models
6.2 Marketing mix
6.3 Advertising research
6.4 Semiotics


7 Gender effects in the processing of advertising
8 See also
9 References
10 Further reading

10.1 History


11 External links



History[edit]
Main article: History of advertising




Bronze plate for printing an advertisement for the Liu family needle shop at Jinan, Song dynasty China. It is considered the world's earliest identified printed advertising medium.


Egyptians used papyrus to make sales messages and wall posters.[9] Commercial messages and political campaign displays have been found in the ruins of Pompeii and ancient Arabia. Lost and found advertising on papyrus was common in ancient Greece and ancient Rome. Wall or rock painting for commercial advertising is another manifestation of an ancient advertising form, which is present to this day in many parts of Asia, Africa, and South America. The tradition of wall painting can be traced back to Indian rock art paintings that date back to 4000 BC.[10]
In ancient China, the earliest advertising known was oral, as recorded in the Classic of Poetry (11th to 7th centuries BC) of bamboo flutes played to sell candy. Advertisement usually takes in the form of calligraphic signboards and inked papers. A copper printing plate dated back to the Song dynasty used to print posters in the form of a square sheet of paper with a rabbit logo with "Jinan Liu's Fine Needle Shop" and "We buy high-quality steel rods and make fine-quality needles, to be ready for use at home in no time" written above and below[11] is considered the world's earliest identified printed advertising medium.[12]
In Europe, as the towns and cities of the Middle Ages began to grow, and the general population was unable to read, instead of signs that read "cobbler", "miller", "tailor", or "blacksmith", images associated with their trade would be used such as a boot, a suit, a hat, a clock, a diamond, a horse shoe, a candle or even a bag of flour. Fruits and vegetables were sold in the city square from the backs of carts and wagons and their proprietors used street callers (town criers) to announce their whereabouts for the convenience of the customers. The first compilation of such advertisements was gathered in "Les Crieries de Paris", a thirteenth-century poem by Guillaume de la Villeneuve.[13]
In the 18th century advertisements started to appear in weekly newspapers in England. These early print advertisements were used mainly to promote books and newspapers, which became increasingly affordable with advances in the printing press; and medicines, which were increasingly sought after as disease ravaged Europe. However, false advertising and so-called "quack" advertisements became a problem, which ushered in the regulation of advertising content.
19th century[edit]




Edo period LEL flyer from 1806 for a traditional medicine called Kinseitan.







This article or section appears to contradict itself. Please see the talk page for more information. (January 2017)


Thomas J. Barratt from London has been called "the father of modern advertising".[14][15][16] Working for the Pears Soap company, Barratt created an effective advertising campaign for the company products, which involved the use of targeted slogans, images and phrases. One of his slogans, "Good morning. Have you used Pears' soap?" was famous in its day and into the 20th century.[17][18]
Barratt introduced many of the crucial ideas that lie behind successful advertising and these were widely circulated in his day. He constantly stressed the importance of a strong and exclusive brand image for Pears and of emphasizing the product's availability through saturation campaigns. He also understood the importance of constantly reevaluating the market for changing tastes and mores, stating in 1907 that "tastes change, fashions change, and the advertiser has to change with them. An idea that was effective a generation ago would fall flat, stale, and unprofitable if presented to the public today. Not that the idea of today is always better than the older idea, but it is different – it hits the present taste."[15]
As the economy expanded across the world during the 19th century, advertising grew alongside. In the United States, the success of this advertising format eventually led to the growth of mail-order advertising.





This section's factual accuracy is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on Talk:Advertising. Please help to ensure that disputed statements are reliably sourced. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In June 1836, French newspaper La Presse was the first to include paid advertising in its pages, allowing it to lower its price, extend its readership and increase its profitability and the formula was soon copied by all titles. Around 1840, Volney B. Palmer established the roots of the modern day advertising agency in Philadelphia. In 1842 Palmer bought large amounts of space in various newspapers at a discounted rate then resold the space at higher rates to advertisers. The actual ad – the copy, layout, and artwork – was still prepared by the company wishing to advertise; in effect, Palmer was a space broker. The situation changed in the late 19th century when the advertising agency of N.W. Ayer & Son was founded. Ayer and Son offered to plan, create, and execute complete advertising campaigns for its customers. By 1900 the advertising agency had become the focal point of creative planning, and advertising was firmly established as a profession.
[19] Around the same time, in France, Charles-Louis Havas extended the services of his news agency, Havas to include advertisement brokerage, making it the first French group to organize. At first, agencies were brokers for advertisement space in newspapers. N. W. Ayer & Son was the first full-service agency to assume responsibility for advertising content. N.W. Ayer opened in 1869, and was located in Philadelphia.[19]
20th century[edit]




Advert for Guy's Tonic Wellcome in 1900's






A print advertisement for the 1913 issue of the Encyclopædia Britannica.


Advertising increased dramatically in the United States as industrialization expanded the supply of manufactured products. In order to profit from this higher rate of production, industry needed to recruit workers as consumers of factory products. It did so through the invention of mass marketing designed to influence the population's economic behavior on a larger scale.[20] In the 1910s and 1920s, advertisers in the U.S. adopted the doctrine that human instincts could be targeted and harnessed – "sublimated" into the desire to purchase commodities.[21] Edward Bernays, a nephew of Sigmund Freud, became associated with the method and is sometimes called the founder of modern advertising and public relations.[22]
In the 1920s, under Secretary of Commerce Herbert Hoover, the American government promoted advertising. Hoover himself delivered an address to the Associated Advertising Clubs of the World in 1925 called 'Advertising Is a Vital Force in Our National Life."[23] In October 1929, the head of the U.S. Bureau of Foreign and Domestic Commerce, Julius Klein, stated "Advertising is the key to world prosperity."[24] This was part of the "unparalleled" collaboration between business and government in the 1920s, according to a 1933 European economic journal.[25]
The tobacco companies became major advertisers in order to sell packaged cigarettes.[26] The tobacco companies pioneered the new advertising techniques when they hired Bernays to create positive associations with tobacco smoking.[3][4]
Advertising was also used as a vehicle for cultural assimilation, encouraging workers to exchange their traditional habits and community structure in favor of a shared "modern" lifestyle.[27] An important tool for influencing immigrant workers was the American Association of Foreign Language Newspapers (AAFLN). The AAFLN was primarily an advertising agency but also gained heavily centralized control over much of the immigrant press.[28][29]




1916 Ladies' Home Journal version of the famous ad by Helen Lansdowne Resor of the J. Walter Thompson Agency


At the turn of the 20th century, there were few career choices for women in business; however, advertising was one of the few. Since women were responsible for most of the purchasing done in their household, advertisers and agencies recognized the value of women's insight during the creative process. In fact, the first American advertising to use a sexual sell was created by a woman – for a soap product. Although tame by today's standards, the advertisement featured a couple with the message "A skin you love to touch".[30]
In the 1920s psychologists Walter D. Scott and John B. Watson contributed applied psychological theory to the field of advertising. Scott said, "Man has been called the reasoning animal but he could with greater truthfulness be called the creature of suggestion. He is reasonable, but he is to a greater extent suggestible".[31] He demonstrated this through his advertising technique of a direct command to the consumer.
On the radio from the 1920s[edit]




Advertisement for a live radio broadcast, sponsored by a milk company, Adohr milk, and published in the Los Angeles Times on May 6, 1930


In the early 1920s, the first radio stations were established by radio equipment manufacturers and retailers who offered programs in order to sell more radios to consumers. As time passed, many non-profit organizations followed suit in setting up their own radio stations, and included: schools, clubs and civic groups.[32]
When the practice of sponsoring programs was popularized, each individual radio program was usually sponsored by a single business in exchange for a brief mention of the business' name at the beginning and end of the sponsored shows. However, radio station owners soon realized they could earn more money by selling sponsorship rights in small time allocations to multiple businesses throughout their radio station's broadcasts, rather than selling the sponsorship rights to single businesses per show.[citation needed]

Commercial television in the 1950s[edit]
In the early 1950s, the DuMont Television Network began the modern practice of selling advertisement time to multiple sponsors. Previously, DuMont had trouble finding sponsors for many of their programs and compensated by selling smaller blocks of advertising time to several businesses. This eventually became the standard for the commercial television industry in the United States. However, it was still a common practice to have single sponsor shows, such as The United States Steel Hour. In some instances the sponsors exercised great control over the content of the show – up to and including having one's advertising agency actually writing the show.[citation needed] The single sponsor model is much less prevalent now, a notable exception being the Hallmark Hall of Fame.[citation needed]
Cable television from the 1980s[edit]
The late 1980s and early 1990s saw the introduction of cable television and particularly MTV. Pioneering the concept of the music video, MTV ushered in a new type of advertising: the consumer tunes in for the advertising message, rather than it being a by-product or afterthought. As cable and satellite television became increasingly prevalent, specialty channels emerged, including channels entirely devoted to advertising, such as QVC, Home Shopping Network, and ShopTV Canada.[citation needed]
On the Internet from the 1990s[edit]
Main article: Online advertising
With the advent of the ad server, online advertising grew, contributing to the "dot-com" boom of the 1990s.[33] Entire corporations operated solely on advertising revenue, offering everything from coupons to free Internet access. At the turn of the 21st century, some websites, including the search engine Google, changed online advertising by personalizing ads based on web browsing behavior. This has led to other similar efforts and an increase in interactive advertising.[34]
The share of advertising spending relative to GDP has changed little across large changes in media since 1925. In 1925, the main advertising media in America were newspapers, magazines, signs on streetcars, and outdoor posters. Advertising spending as a share of GDP was about 2.9 percent. By 1998, television and radio had become major advertising media. Nonetheless, advertising spending as a share of GDP was slightly lower – about 2.4 percent.[35]
Guerrilla marketing involves unusual approaches such as staged encounters in public places, giveaways of products such as cars that are covered with brand messages, and interactive advertising where the viewer can respond to become part of the advertising message. This type of advertising is unpredictable, which causes consumers to buy the product or idea.[36] This reflects an increasing trend of interactive and "embedded" ads, such as via product placement, having consumers vote through text messages, and various campaigns utilizing social network services such as Facebook or Twitter.[37]
The advertising business model has also been adapted in recent years.[when?] [clarification needed]In media for equity, advertising is not sold, but provided to start-up companies in return for equity. If the company grows and is sold, the media companies receive cash for their shares.
Domain name registrants (usually those who register and renew domains as an investment) sometimes "park" their domains and allow advertising companies to place ads on their sites in return for per-click payments.[38] These ads are typically driven by pay per click search engines like Google or Yahoo, but ads can sometimes be placed directly on targeted domain names through a domain lease or by making contact with the registrant of a domain name that describes a product.[39] Domain name registrants are generally easy to identify through WHOIS records that are publicly available at registrar websites.[40]
Classification[edit]


Play media


An advertisement for the Wikimedia Foundation.






An advertisement for a diner. Such signs are common on storefronts.






Paying people to hold signs is one of the oldest forms of advertising, as with this human billboard.






A taxicab with an advertisement for Allianz in Singapore. Buses and other vehicles are popular media for advertisers.






Mobile Billboard in East Coast Park, Singapore.






A DBAG Class 101 with UNICEF ads at Ingolstadt main railway station.






A London Bus, with a film advertisement along its side.






Hot air balloon displays advertising for GEO magazine


Advertising may be categorized in a variety of ways, including by style, target audience, geographic scope, medium, or purpose.[2]:9–15 For example, in print advertising, classification by style can include display advertising (ads with design elements sold by size) vs. classified advertising (ads without design elements sold by the word or line). Advertising may be local, national or global. An ad campaign may be directed toward consumers or to businesses. The purpose of an ad may be to raise awareness (brand advertising), or to elicit an immediate sale (direct response advertising).
Traditional media[edit]
Virtually any medium can be used for advertising. Commercial advertising media can include wall paintings, billboards, street furniture components, printed flyers and rack cards, radio, cinema and television adverts, web banners, mobile telephone screens, shopping carts, web popups, skywriting, bus stop benches, human billboards and forehead advertising, magazines, newspapers, town criers, sides of buses, banners attached to or sides of airplanes ("logojets"), in-flight advertisements on seatback tray tables or overhead storage bins, taxicab doors, roof mounts and passenger screens, musical stage shows, subway platforms and trains, elastic bands on disposable diapers, doors of bathroom stalls, stickers on apples in supermarkets, shopping cart handles (grabertising), the opening section of streaming audio and video, posters, and the backs of event tickets and supermarket receipts. Any place an "identified" sponsor pays to deliver their message through a medium is advertising.[41]

Share of global adspend [42]

medium
2015
2017[disputed – discuss]


Television advertisement
37.7%
34.8%


Desktop online advertising
19.9%
18.2%


Mobile advertising
9.2%
18.4%


Newspaper#Advertising
12.8%
10.1%


Magazines
6.5%
5.3%


Outdoor advertising
6.8%
6.6%


Radio advertisement
6.5%
5.9%


Cinema
0.6%
0.7%



Television
Television advertising is one of the most expensive types of advertising; networks charge large amounts for commercial airtime during popular events. The annual Super Bowl football game in the United States is known as the most prominent advertising event on television – with an audience of over 108 million and studies showing that 50% of those only tuned in to see the advertisements.[43][44] The average cost of a single thirty-second television spot during this game reached US$4 million & a 60-second spot double that figure in 2014.[43] Virtual advertisements may be inserted into regular programming through computer graphics. It is typically inserted into otherwise blank backdrops[45] or used to replace local billboards that are not relevant to the remote broadcast audience.[46] More controversially, virtual billboards may be inserted into the background[47] where none exist in real-life. This technique is especially used in televised sporting events.[48][49] Virtual product placement is also possible.[50][51] An infomercial is a long-format television commercial, typically five minutes or longer. The word "infomercial" is a portmanteau of the words "information" and "commercial". The main objective in an infomercial is to create an impulse purchase, so that the target sees the presentation and then immediately buys the product through the advertised toll-free telephone number or website. Infomercials describe, display, and often demonstrate products and their features, and commonly have testimonials from customers and industry professionals.[citation needed]





Television commercial 1948



Radio
Radio advertisements are broadcast as radio waves to the air from a transmitter to an antenna and a thus to a receiving device. Airtime is purchased from a station or network in exchange for airing the commercials. While radio has the limitation of being restricted to sound, proponents of radio advertising often cite this as an advantage. Radio is an expanding medium that can be found on air, and also online. According to Arbitron, radio has approximately 241.6 million weekly listeners, or more than 93 percent of the U.S. population.[citation needed]


Online
Online advertising is a form of promotion that uses the Internet and World Wide Web for the expressed purpose of delivering marketing messages to attract customers. Online ads are delivered by an ad server. Examples of online advertising include contextual ads that appear on search engine results pages, banner ads, in pay per click text ads, rich media ads, Social network advertising, online classified advertising, advertising networks and e-mail marketing, including e-mail spam.[citation needed] A newer form of online advertising is Native Ads; they go in a website's news feed and are supposed to improve user experience by being less intrusive. However, some people argue this practice is deceptive.[52]


Domain names
Domain name advertising is most commonly done through pay per click web search engines, however, advertisers often lease space directly on domain names that generically describe their products.[39] When an Internet user visits a website by typing a domain name directly into their web browser, this is known as "direct navigation", or "type in" web traffic. Although many Internet users search for ideas and products using search engines and mobile phones, a large number of users around the world still use the address bar. They will type a keyword into the address bar such as "geraniums" and add ".com" to the end of it. Sometimes they will do the same with ".org" or a country-code Top Level Domain (TLD such as ".co.uk" for the United Kingdom or ".ca" for Canada). When Internet users type in a generic keyword and add .com or another top-level domain (TLD) ending, it produces a targeted sales lead.[53] Domain name advertising was originally developed by Oingo (later known as Applied Semantics), one of Google's early acquisitions.[54]


Product placements
Covert advertising is when a product or brand is embedded in entertainment and media. For example, in a film, the main character can use an item or other of a definite brand, as in the movie Minority Report, where Tom Cruise's character John Anderton owns a phone with the Nokia logo clearly written in the top corner, or his watch engraved with the Bulgari logo. Another example of advertising in film is in I, Robot, where main character played by Will Smith mentions his Converse shoes several times, calling them "classics", because the film is set far in the future. I, Robot and Spaceballs also showcase futuristic cars with the Audi and Mercedes-Benz logos clearly displayed on the front of the vehicles. Cadillac chose to advertise in the movie The Matrix Reloaded, which as a result contained many scenes in which Cadillac cars were used. Similarly, product placement for Omega Watches, Ford, VAIO, BMW and Aston Martin cars are featured in recent James Bond films, most notably Casino Royale. In "Fantastic Four: Rise of the Silver Surfer", the main transport vehicle shows a large Dodge logo on the front. Blade Runner includes some of the most obvious product placement; the whole film stops to show a Coca-Cola billboard.[citation needed]





This article's factual accuracy is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please help to ensure that disputed statements are reliably sourced. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Print
Print advertising describes advertising in a printed medium such as a newspaper, magazine, or trade journal. This encompasses everything from media with a very broad readership base, such as a major national newspaper or magazine, to more narrowly targeted media such as local newspapers and trade journals on very specialized topics. One form of print advertising is classified advertising, which allows private individuals or companies to purchase a small, narrowly targeted ad paid by the word or line. Another form of print advertising is the display ad, which is generally a larger ad with design elements that typically run in an article section of a newspaper.[2]:14


Outdoor
Billboards, also known as hoardings in some parts of the world, are large structures located in public places which display advertisements to passing pedestrians and motorists. Most often, they are located on main roads with a large amount of passing motor and pedestrian traffic; however, they can be placed in any location with large amounts of viewers, such as on mass transit vehicles and in stations, in shopping malls or office buildings, and in stadiums.[55] The form known as street advertising first came to prominence in the UK by Street Advertising Services to create outdoor advertising on street furniture and pavements. Working with products such as Reverse Graffiti, air dancers and 3D pavement advertising, for getting brand messages out into public spaces.[citation needed] Sheltered outdoor advertising combines outdoor with indoor advertisement by placing large mobile, structures (tents) in public places on temporary bases. The large outer advertising space aims to exert a strong pull on the observer, the product is promoted indoors, where the creative decor can intensify the impression.[citation needed] Mobile billboards are generally vehicle mounted billboards or digital screens. These can be on dedicated vehicles built solely for carrying advertisements along routes preselected by clients, they can also be specially equipped cargo trucks or, in some cases, large banners strewn from planes. The billboards are often lighted; some being backlit, and others employing spotlights. Some billboard displays are static, while others change; for example, continuously or periodically rotating among a set of advertisements. Mobile displays are used for various situations in metropolitan areas throughout the world, including: target advertising, one-day and long-term campaigns, conventions, sporting events, store openings and similar promotional events, and big advertisements from smaller companies.[citation needed]





The RedEye newspaper advertised to its target market at North Avenue Beach with a sailboat billboard on Lake Michigan.



Point-of-sale
In-store advertising is any advertisement placed in a retail store. It includes placement of a product in visible locations in a store, such as at eye level, at the ends of aisles and near checkout counters (a.k.a. POP – point of purchase display), eye-catching displays promoting a specific product, and advertisements in such places as shopping carts and in-store video displays.[citation needed]





This article's factual accuracy is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please help to ensure that disputed statements are reliably sourced. (January 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Novelties
Advertising printed on small tangible items such as coffee mugs, T-shirts, pens, bags, and such is known as novelty advertising. Some printers specialize in printing novelty items, which can then be distributed directly by the advertiser, or items may be distributed as part of a cross-promotion, such as ads on fast food containers.[citation needed]


Celebrity branding






This section may stray from the topic of the article. Please help improve this section or discuss this issue on the talk page. (January 2017)


This type of advertising focuses upon using celebrity power, fame, money, popularity to gain recognition for their products and promote specific stores or products. Advertisers often advertise their products, for example, when celebrities share their favorite products or wear clothes by specific brands or designers. Celebrities are often involved in advertising campaigns such as television or print adverts to advertise specific or general products. The use of celebrities to endorse a brand can have its downsides, however; one mistake by a celebrity can be detrimental to the public relations of a brand. For example, following his performance of eight gold medals at the 2008 Olympic Games in Beijing, China, swimmer Michael Phelps' contract with Kellogg's was terminated, as Kellogg's did not want to associate with him after he was photographed smoking marijuana.[citation needed] Celebrities such as Britney Spears have advertised for multiple products including Pepsi, Candies from Kohl's, Twister, NASCAR, and Toyota.[citation needed]


Aerial
Using aircraft, balloons or airships to create or display advertising media. Skywriting is a notable example.[citation needed]





An Allegiant Air aircraft in the special Blue Man Group livery.


New media and advertising approaches[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (April 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Increasingly, other media are overtaking many of the "traditional" media such as television, radio and newspaper because of a shift toward the usage of the Internet for news and music as well as devices like digital video recorders (DVRs) such as TiVo.[56]
Online advertising began with unsolicited bulk e-mail advertising known as "e-mail spam". Spam has been a problem for e-mail users since 1978.[57] As new online communication channels became available, advertising followed. The first banner ad appeared on the World Wide Web in 1994.[58] Prices of Web-based advertising space are dependent on the "relevance" of the surrounding web content and the traffic that the website receives.[citation needed]
In online display advertising, display ads generate awareness quickly. Unlike search, which requires someone to be aware of a need, display advertising can drive awareness of something new and without previous knowledge. Display works well for direct response. Display is not only used for generating awareness, it's used for direct response campaigns that link to a landing page with a clear 'call to action'.[citation needed]
As the mobile phone became a new mass medium in 1998 when the first paid downloadable content appeared on mobile phones in Finland,[59][citation needed] mobile advertising followed, also first launched in Finland in 2000.[citation needed] By 2007 the value of mobile advertising had reached $2 billion and providers such as Admob delivered billions of mobile ads.[citation needed]
More advanced mobile ads include banner ads, coupons, Multimedia Messaging Service picture and video messages, advergames and various engagement marketing campaigns. A particular feature driving mobile ads is the 2D barcode, which replaces the need to do any typing of web addresses, and uses the camera feature of modern phones to gain immediate access to web content. 83 percent of Japanese mobile phone users already are active users of 2D barcodes.[citation needed]
Some companies have proposed placing messages or corporate logos on the side of booster rockets and the International Space Station.[citation needed]
Unpaid advertising (also called "publicity advertising"), can include personal recommendations ("bring a friend", "sell it"), spreading buzz, or achieving the feat of equating a brand with a common noun (in the United States, "Xerox" = "photocopier", "Kleenex" = tissue, "Vaseline" = petroleum jelly, "Hoover" = vacuum cleaner, and "Band-Aid" = adhesive bandage). However, some companies[which?] oppose the use of their brand name to label an object. Equating a brand with a common noun also risks turning that brand into a generic trademark – turning it into a generic term which means that its legal protection as a trademark is lost.[60][disputed – discuss]
From time to time, The CW Television Network airs short programming breaks called "Content Wraps", to advertise one company's product during an entire commercial break. The CW pioneered "content wraps" and some products featured were Herbal Essences, Crest, Guitar Hero II, CoverGirl, and recently Toyota.[citation needed]
A new promotion concept has appeared, "ARvertising", advertising on Augmented Reality technology.[61]
Controversy exists on the effectiveness of subliminal advertising (see mind control), and the pervasiveness of mass messages (Propaganda).
Rise in new media[edit]




US Newspaper Advertising Revenue

Newspaper Association of America published data [62]


With the Internet came many new advertising opportunities. Popup, Flash, banner, Popunder, advergaming, and email advertisements (all of which are often unwanted or spam in the case of email) are now commonplace. Particularly since the rise of "entertaining" advertising, some people may like an advertisement enough to wish to watch it later or show a friend.[citation needed] In general, the advertising community has not yet made this easy, although some have used the Internet to widely distribute their ads to anyone willing to see or hear them. In the last three-quarters of 2009 mobile and internet advertising grew by 18% and 9% respectively. Older media advertising saw declines: −10.1% (TV), −11.7% (radio), −14.8% (magazines) and −18.7% (newspapers).[citation needed]
Niche marketing[edit]
Another significant trend regarding future of advertising is the growing importance of the niche market using niche or targeted ads. Also brought about by the Internet and the theory of the long tail, advertisers will have an increasing ability to reach specific audiences. In the past, the most efficient way to deliver a message was to blanket the largest mass market audience possible.[citation needed] However, usage tracking, customer profiles and the growing popularity of niche content brought about by everything from blogs to social networking sites, provide advertisers with audiences that are smaller but much better defined,[citation needed] leading to ads that are more relevant to viewers and more effective for companies' marketing products. Among others, Comcast Spotlight is one such advertiser employing this method in their video on demand menus. These advertisements are targeted to a specific group and can be viewed by anyone wishing to find out more about a particular business or practice, from their home. This causes the viewer to become proactive and actually choose what advertisements they want to view.[63]
Google AdSense is an example of niche marketing. Google calculates the primary purpose of a website and adjusts ads accordingly; it uses key words on the page (or even in emails) to find the general ideas of topics disused and places ads that will most likely be clicked on by viewers of the email account or website visitors.[64]
Crowdsourcing[edit]
Main article: Crowdsourcing
The concept of crowdsourcing has given way to the trend of user-generated advertisements. User-generated ads are created by people, as opposed to an advertising agency or the company themselves, often resulting from brand sponsored advertising competitions. For the 2007 Super Bowl, the Frito-Lays division of PepsiCo held the Crash the Super Bowl contest, allowing people to create their own Doritos commercial.[65] Chevrolet held a similar competition for their Tahoe line of SUVs.[65] Due to the success of the Doritos user-generated ads in the 2007 Super Bowl, Frito-Lays relaunched the competition for the 2009 and 2010 Super Bowl. The resulting ads were among the most-watched and most-liked Super Bowl ads. In fact, the winning ad that aired in the 2009 Super Bowl was ranked by the USA Today Super Bowl Ad Meter as the top ad for the year while the winning ads that aired in the 2010 Super Bowl were found by Nielsen's BuzzMetrics to be the "most buzzed-about".[66][67] Another example of companies using crowdsourcing successfully is the beverage company Jones Soda that encourages consumers to participate in the label design themselves.
This trend has given rise to several online platforms that host user-generated advertising competitions on behalf of a company. Founded in 2007, Zooppa has launched ad competitions for brands such as Google, Nike, Hershey's, General Mills, Microsoft, NBC Universal, Zinio, and Mini Cooper.[68] Crowdsourced remains controversial, as the long-term impact on the advertising industry is still unclear.[69]
Global advertising[edit]
Main article: Global marketing
Advertising has gone through five major stages of development: domestic, export, international, multi-national, and global. For global advertisers, there are four, potentially competing, business objectives that must be balanced when developing worldwide advertising: building a brand while speaking with one voice, developing economies of scale in the creative process, maximising local effectiveness of ads, and increasing the company's speed of implementation. Born from the evolutionary stages of global marketing are the three primary and fundamentally different approaches to the development of global advertising executions: exporting executions, producing local executions, and importing ideas that travel.[70]
Advertising research is key to determining the success of an ad in any country or region. The ability to identify which elements and/or moments of an ad contribute to its success is how economies of scale are maximized. Once one knows what works in an ad, that idea or ideas can be imported by any other market. Market research measures, such as Flow of Attention, Flow of Emotion and branding moments provide insight into what is working in an ad in any country or region because the measures are based on the visual, not verbal, elements of the ad.[71]
Foreign public messaging[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (December 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (December 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


See also: Soft power and International tourism advertising
Foreign governments,[which?] particularly those that own marketable commercial products or services, often promote their interests and positions through the advertising of those goods because the target audience is not only largely unaware of the forum as a vehicle for foreign messaging but also willing to receive the message while in a mental state of absorbing information from advertisements during television commercial breaks, while reading a periodical, or while passing by billboards in public spaces. A prime example of this messaging technique is advertising campaigns to promote international travel. While advertising foreign destinations and services may stem from the typical goal of increasing revenue by drawing more tourism, some travel campaigns carry the additional or alternative intended purpose of promoting good sentiments or improving existing ones among the target audience towards a given nation or region. It is common for advertising promoting foreign countries to be produced and distributed by the tourism ministries of those countries, so these ads often carry political statements and/or depictions of the foreign government's desired international public perception. Additionally, a wide range of foreign airlines and travel-related services which advertise separately from the destinations, themselves, are owned by their respective governments; examples include, though are not limited to, the Emirates airline (Dubai), Singapore Airlines (Singapore), Qatar Airways (Qatar), China Airlines (Taiwan/Republic of China), and Air China (People's Republic of China). By depicting their destinations, airlines, and other services in a favorable and pleasant light, countries market themselves to populations abroad in a manner that could mitigate prior public impressions.
Diversification[edit]
In the realm of advertising agencies, continued industry diversification has seen observers note that "big global clients don't need big global agencies any more".[72] This is reflected by the growth of non-traditional agencies in various global markets, such as Canadian business TAXI and SMART in Australia and has been referred to as "a revolution in the ad world".[73]
New technology[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (December 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


The ability to record shows on digital video recorders (such as TiVo) allow watchers to record the programs for later viewing, enabling them to fast forward through commercials. Additionally, as more seasons of pre-recorded box sets are offered for sale of television programs; fewer people watch the shows on TV. However, the fact that these sets are sold, means the company will receive additional profits from these sets.
To counter this effect, a variety of strategies have been employed. Many advertisers have opted for product placement on TV shows like Survivor. Other strategies include integrating advertising with internet-connected EPGs, advertising on companion devices (like smartphones and tablets) during the show, and creating TV apps. Additionally, some like brands have opted for social television sponsorship.[74]
Advertising education[edit]
Advertising education has become popular with bachelor, master and doctorate degrees becoming available in the emphasis.[citation needed] A surge in advertising interest is typically attributed to the strong relationship advertising plays in cultural and technological changes, such as the advance of online social networking.[citation needed] A unique model for teaching advertising is the student-run advertising agency, where advertising students create campaigns for real companies.[75] Organizations such as the American Advertising Federation establish companies with students to create these campaigns.[citation needed]
Purposes[edit]
Advertising is at the front of delivering the proper message to customers and prospective customers. The purpose of advertising is to convince customers that a company's services or products are the best, enhance the image of the company, point out and create a need for products or services, demonstrate new uses for established products, announce new products and programs, reinforce the salespeople's individual messages, draw customers to the business, and to hold existing customers.[76]
Sales promotions and brand loyalty[edit]
Sales promotions are another way to advertise. Sales promotions are double purposed because they are used to gather information about what type of customers one draws in and where they are, and to jump start sales. Sales promotions include things like contests and games, sweepstakes, product giveaways, samples coupons, loyalty programs, and discounts. The ultimate goal of sales promotions is to stimulate potential customers to action.[77]
One way to create brand loyalty is to reward consumers for spending time interacting with the brand.[78][original research?] This method may come in many forms like rewards card, rewards programs and sampling.
Criticisms[edit]
Main article: Criticism of advertising




Mobstr - Visual Pollution, London (5914547783)


While advertising can be seen as necessary for economic growth,[24] it is not without social costs. Unsolicited commercial e-mail and other forms of spam have become so prevalent as to have become a major nuisance to users of these services, as well as being a financial burden on internet service providers.[79] Advertising is increasingly invading public spaces, such as schools, which some critics argue is a form of child exploitation.[80]
One of the most controversial criticisms of advertisement in the present day is that of the predominance of advertising of foods high in sugar, fat, and salt specifically to children. Critics claim that food advertisements targeting children are exploitive and are not sufficiently balanced with proper nutritional education to help children understand the consequences of their food choices. Additionally, children may not understand that they are being sold something, and are therefore more impressionable.[81][better source needed] Michelle Obama has criticized large food companies for advertising unhealthy foods largely towards children and has requested that food companies either limit their advertising to children or advertise foods that are more in line with dietary guidelines.[82] The other criticisms include the change that are brought by those advertisements on the society and also the deceiving ads that are aired and published by the corporations. Cosmetic and health industry are the ones which exploited the highest and created reasons of concern.[83]
Regulation[edit]
There have been increasing efforts to protect the public interest by regulating the content and the influence of advertising. Some examples include restrictions for advertising alcohol, tobacco or gambling imposed in many countries, as well as the bans around advertising to children, which exist in parts of Europe. Advertising regulation focuses heavily on the veracity of the claims and as such, there are often tighter restrictions placed around advertisements for food and healthcare products.[84]
The advertising industries within some countries rely less on laws and more on systems of self-regulation.[84][85][86] Advertisers and the media agree on a code of advertising standards that they attempt to uphold. The general aim of such codes is to ensure that any advertising is 'legal, decent, honest and truthful'. Some self-regulatory organizations are funded by the industry, but remain independent, with the intent of upholding the standards or codes like the Advertising Standards Authority in the UK.[87]
In the UK, most forms of outdoor advertising such as the display of billboards is regulated by the UK Town and County Planning system. Currently, the display of an advertisement without consent from the Planning Authority is a criminal offense liable to a fine of £2,500 per offense.[88] In the US, many communities believe that many forms of outdoor advertising blight the public realm.[89] As long ago as the 1960s in the US there were attempts to ban billboard advertising in the open countryside.[90] Cities such as São Paulo have introduced an outright ban[91] with London also having specific legislation to control unlawful displays.
Some governments restrict the languages that can be used in advertisements, but advertisers may employ tricks to try avoiding them. In France for instance, advertisers sometimes print English words in bold and French translations in fine print to deal with Article 120 of the 1994 Toubon Law limiting the use of English).[92]
The advertising of pricing information is another topic of concern for governments. In the United States for instance, it is common for businesses to only mention the existence and amount of applicable taxes at a later stage of a transaction.[93] In Canada and New Zealand, taxes can be listed as separate items, as long as they are quoted up-front.[94][95] In most other countries, the advertised price must include all applicable taxes, enabling customers to easily know how much it will cost them.[96][97][98]
Theory[edit]
See also: Advertising management
Hierarchy-of-effects models[edit]
Various competing models of hierarchies of effects attempt to provide a theoretical underpinning to advertising practice.[clarification needed][99]

The model of Clow and Baack[100] clarifies the objectives of an advertising campaign and for each individual advertisement. The model postulates six steps a buyer moves through when making a purchase:

Awareness
Knowledge
Liking
Preference
Conviction
Purchase


Means-End Theory suggests that an advertisement should contain a message or means that leads the consumer to a desired end-state.[101]
Leverage Points aim to move the consumer from understanding a product's benefits to linking those benefits with personal values.[citation needed]

Marketing mix[edit]





This section may stray from the topic of the article. Please help improve this section or discuss this issue on the talk page. (January 2017)


Main article: Marketing mix
The marketing mix was proposed by professor E. Jerome McCarthy in the 1960s.[102] It consists of four basic elements called the "four Ps". Product is the first P representing the actual product. Price represents the process of determining the value of a product. Place represents the variables of getting the product to the consumer such as distribution channels, market coverage and movement organization. The last P stands for Promotion which is the process of reaching the target market and convincing them to buy the product.
In the 1990s, the concept of four Cs was introduced as a more customer-driven replacement of four P's.[103] There are two theories based on four Cs: Lauterborn's four Cs (consumer, cost, communication, convenience) [104] and Shimizu's four Cs (commodity, cost, communication, channel) in the 7Cs Compass Model (Co-marketing). Communications can include advertising, sales promotion, public relations, publicity, personal selling, corporate identity, internal communication, SNS, MIS.[105][106][107][108]
Advertising research[edit]
Main article: Advertising research
Advertising research is a specialized form of research that works to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of advertising. It entails numerous forms of research which employ different methodologies. Advertising research includes pre-testing (also known as copy testing) and post-testing of ads and/or campaigns.
Pre-testing includes a wide range of qualitative and quantitative techniques, including: focus groups, in-depth target audience interviews (one-on-one interviews), small-scale quantitative studies and physiological measurement. The goal of these investigations is to better understand how different groups respond to various messages and visual prompts, thereby providing an assessment of how well the advertisement meets its communications goals.[109]
Post-testing employs many of the same techniques as pre-testing, usually with a focus on understanding the change in awareness or attitude attributable to the advertisement. With the emergence of digital advertising technologies, many firms have begun to continuously post-test ads using real-time data. This may take the form of A/B split-testing or multivariate testing.
Continuous ad tracking and the Communicus System are competing examples of post-testing advertising research types.[110]
Semiotics[edit]
Main article: Advertising research
Meanings between consumers and marketers depict signs and symbols that are encoded in everyday objects.[111][need quotation to verify] Semiotics is the study of signs and how they are interpreted. Advertising has many hidden signs and meanings[citation needed] within brand names, logos, package designs, print advertisements, and television advertisements. Semiotics aims to study and interpret the message being conveyed in (for example) advertisements. Logos and advertisements can be interpreted at two levels – known as the surface level and the underlying level. The surface level uses signs creatively to create an image or personality for a product.[citation needed] These signs can be images, words, fonts, colors, or slogans. The underlying level is made up of hidden meanings. The combination of images, words, colors, and slogans must be interpreted by the audience or consumer.[112] The "key to advertising analysis" is the signifier and the signified. The signifier is the object and the signified is the mental concept.[113] A product has a signifier and a signified. The signifier is the color, brand name, logo design, and technology. The signified has two meanings known as denotative and connotative. The denotative meaning is the meaning of the product. A television's denotative meaning might be that it is high definition. The connotative meaning is the product's deep and hidden meaning. A connotative meaning of a television would be that it is top-of-the-line.[114]
Apple's commercials[when?] used a black silhouette of a person that was the age of Apple's target market. They placed the silhouette in front of a blue screen so that the picture behind the silhouette could be constantly changing. However, the one thing that stays the same in these ads is that there is music in the background and the silhouette is listening to that music on a white iPod through white headphones. Through advertising, the white color on a set of earphones now signifies that the music device is an iPod. The white color signifies almost all of Apple's products.[115]
The semiotics of gender plays a key influence on the way in which signs are interpreted. When considering gender roles in advertising, individuals are influenced by three categories. Certain characteristics of stimuli may enhance or decrease the elaboration of the message (if the product is perceived as feminine or masculine). Second, the characteristics of individuals can affect attention and elaboration of the message (traditional or non-traditional gender role orientation). Lastly, situational factors may be important to influence the elaboration of the message.[116]
There are two types of marketing communication claims-objective and subjective.[117] Objective claims stem from the extent to which the claim associates the brand with a tangible product or service feature. For instance, a camera may have auto-focus features. Subjective claims convey emotional, subjective, impressions of intangible aspects of a product or service. They are non-physical features of a product or service that cannot be directly perceived, as they have no physical reality. For instance the brochure has a beautiful design.[118] Males tend to respond better to objective marketing-communications claims while females tend to respond better to subjective marketing communications claims.[119]
Voiceovers are commonly used in advertising. Most voiceovers are done by men, with figures of up to 94% having been reported.[120] There have been more female voiceovers in recent years[when?], but mainly for food, household products, and feminine-care products.[121]
Gender effects in the processing of advertising[edit]
According to a 1977 study by David Statt, females process information comprehensively, while males process information through heuristic devices such as procedures, methods or strategies for solving problems, which could have an effect on how they interpret advertising.[122][need quotation to verify] According to this study, men prefer to have available and apparent cues to interpret the message, whereas females engage in more creative, associative, imagery-laced interpretation. Later research by a Danish team[123] found that advertising attempts to persuade men to improve their appearance or performance, whereas its approach to women aims at transformation toward an impossible ideal of female presentation.In Paul Suggett's article "The Objectification of Women in Advertising"[124] he discusses the negative impact that these women in advertisements, who are too perfect to be real, have on women in real life. And gives men and young men a skewed and unrealistic expectation of women. Advertising's manipulation of women's aspiration to these ideal types as portrayed in film, in erotic art, in advertising, on stage, within music videos, and through other media exposures requires at least a conditioned rejection of female reality, and thereby takes on a highly ideological cast. Studies show that these expectations of women and young girls negatively impact their views about their bodies and appearances.These advertisements are directed towards men Not everyone agrees: one critic viewed this monologic, gender-specific interpretation of advertising as excessively skewed and politicized.[125][need quotation to verify] There are some companies however like Dove and Aerie that are creating commercials to portray more natural women that are less photo shopped so more women and young girls are able to relate to them. These commercials give more natural beauty standards.
More recent research by Martin (2003) reveals that males and females differ in how they react to advertising depending on their mood at the time of exposure to the ads, and on the affective tone of the advertising. When feeling sad, males prefer happy ads to boost their mood. In contrast, females prefer happy ads when they are feeling happy. The television programs in which ads are embedded influence a viewer's mood state.[126] Susan Wojcicki, author of the article "Ads that Empower Women don’t just Break Stereotypes—They’re also Effective"[127] discusses how advertising to women has changed since the first Barbie commercial where a little girl tells the doll that, she wants to be just like her. Little girls grow up watching advertisements of scantily clad women advertising things from trucks to burgers and Wojcicki states it shows girls that they're either arm candy or eye candy. But in recent studies, ads that are shown empowering women such as the #Like A Girl ad campaign[128] by Always have a better effect on women. When women see women being empowered on these ads, they're more likely to watch and share the videos. The views of these ads on sites like YouTube doubled and are more likely to be watched and shared by women.
See also[edit]


Business and economics portal
Media portal




Advertising in biology
Advertisements in schools
Advertising campaign
Advertising management
Advertorial
Bibliography of advertising
Branded content
Co-marketing
Comparative advertising
Conquesting
Copywriting
Demo mode
Family in advertising
Graphic design
History of advertising
History of advertising in Britain
History of Advertising Trust
Informative advertising
Integrated marketing communications
Local advertising
Marketing communications
Marketing Mix
Market overhang
Media planning
Meta-advertising
Mobile marketing
Museum of Brands, Packaging and Advertising
Performance-based advertising
Promotion
Promotional mix
Scad (fraud)
Senior media creative
Sex in advertising
Shock advertising
Television advertisement
Tobacco advertising
Trade literature
Video commerce
Viral marketing
World Federation of Advertisers


References[edit]
Notes


^ a b William J. Stanton. Fundamentals of Marketing. McGraw-Hill (1984).
^ a b c Courtland L. Bovee, William F. Arens. Contemporary Advertising, Fourth Edition. Richard D. Irwin, Inc., 1992.
^ a b Donley T. Studlar (2002) Tobacco Control: Comparative Politics in the United States and Canada p.55 quotation: "... froms. the early days advertising has been intimately intertwined with tobacco. The man who is sometimes considered the founder of modern advertising and Madison Avenue, Edward Bernays, created many of the major cigarette campaigns of the 1920s, including having women march down the street demanding the right to smoke."
^ a b Donald G. Gifford (2010) Suing the Tobacco and Lead Pigment Industries, p.15 quotation: "... during the early twentieth century, tobacco manufacturers virtually created the modern advertising and marketing industry as it is known today."
^ "CARAT PREDICTS POSITIVE OUTLOOK IN 2016 WITH GLOBAL GROWTH OF +4.7%". Carat. 2015-09-22. Retrieved 2015-09-30. 
^ "Plummeting Newspaper Ad Revenue Sparks New Wave of Changes". Wall Street Journal. October 20, 2016. 
^ Parekh, Rupal (July 12, 2012). "Not the 'Big Four' Holding Firms in Adland Anymore – Now It's the Big Five | Agency News – Advertising Age". Adage.com. Retrieved January 18, 2014. 
^ "Latin Word Study Tool". Perseus.tufts.edu. Retrieved January 18, 2014. 
^ Behal, Vikas; Sareen, Sania (2014). "GUERILLA MARKETING: A LOW COST MARKETING STRATEGY". International Journal of Management Research and Business Strategy. 3 – via Google Scholar. 
^ Bhatia (2000). Advertising in Rural India: Language, Marketing Communication, and Consumerism, 62+68
^ "Commercial Advertising in China". Retrieved August 31, 2014. 
^ Hong Liu, Chinese Business: Landscapes and Strategies (2013), p.15.
^ "Les Crieries de Paris". Retrieved July 9, 2015. 
^ He was first described as such in T F G Coates, 'Mr Thomas J Barratt, "The father of modern advertising"', Modern Business, September 1908, pp. 107–15.
^ a b Matt Haig, Brand failures: the truth about the 100 biggest branding mistakes of all time, Kogan Page Publishers, 2005, pp. 219, 266.
^ Nicholas Mirzoeff, The visual culture reader, Routledge, 2002, p. 510.
^ "Obituary, Thomas J. Barratt Dead: Chairman of the Firm of A. & F. Pears an Advertising Genius". New York Times. New York Times. 1914-04-27. p. 11. Retrieved 2014-04-06. 
^ Eric Partridge, Paul Beale, A Dictionary of Catch Phrases: British and American, from the Sixteenth Century to the Present Day, Routledge, 1986, p.164.
^ a b Eskilson, Stephen J. (2007). Graphic Design: A New History. New Haven, Connecticut: Yale University Press. p. 58. ISBN 978-0-300-12011-0. 
^ Ewen, Captains of Consciousness (1976), p. 33. "As Ford's massive assembly line utilized 'extensive single-purpose machinery' to produce automobiles inexpensively and at a rate that dwarfed traditional methods, the costly machinery of advertising that Coolidge had described set out to produce consumers, likewise inexpensively and at a rate that dwarfed traditional methods."
^ Ewen, Captains of Consciousness (1976), p. 34. "While agreeing that 'human nature is more difficult to control than material nature,' ad men spoke in specific terms of 'human instincts' which if properly understood could induce people 'to buy a given product if it was scientifically presented. If advertising copy appealed to the right instincts, the urge to buy would surely be excited'."
^ Anthony DiMaggio (2012). The Rise of the Tea Party: Political Discontent and Corporate Media in the Age of Obama. NYU Press. p. 12. ISBN 978-1-58367-306-5. 
^ Leach, William (1993). Land of Desire. New York: Pantheon Books. p. 375. ISBN 978-0-307-76114-9. 
^ a b Leach, William (1993). Land of Desire. New York: Pantheon Books. p. 367. ISBN 978-0-307-76114-9. 
^ Leach, William (1993). Land of Desire. New York: Pantheon Books. p. 373. ISBN 978-0-307-76114-9. 
^ Brandt (2009) p.31
^ Ewen, Captains of Consciousness (1976), pp. 68–59. "Widespread within the socially oriented literature of business in the twenties and thirties is a notion of educating people into an acceptance of the products and aesthetics of a mass-produced culture. ... Beyond this, and perhaps more important to the consciousness of many, were the indigenous networks of social structure which generated mistrust or open opposition to corporate monopolization of culture."
^ Ewen, Captains of Consciousness (1976), pp. 62–65.
^ Petit, The Men and Women We Want (2010), pp. 66–68.
^ Advertising Slogans Archived May 30, 2012, at Archive.is, Woodbury Soap Company, "A skin you love to touch", J. Walter Thompson Co., 1911
^ Benjamin, L.T., & Baker, D.B. 2004. Industrial-organizational psychology: The new psychology and the business of advertising. From Séance to Science: A History of the Profession of Psychology in America. 118–121. California: Wadsworth/Thomson Learning.
^ McChesney, Robert, Educators and the Battle for Control of U.S. Broadcasting, 1928–35, Rich Media, Poor Democracy, ISBN 0-252-02448-6 (1999)
^ Senn, James A. (2000). "Electronic Commerce Beyond the "dot com" Boom". National Tax Journal. 53 (3, Part 1): 373–383. doi:10.17310/ntj.2000.3.04. 
^ Ko, Hanjun; Cho, Chang-Hoan; Roberts, Marilyn S. (1 June 2005). "Internet Uses and Gratifications: A Structural Equation Model of Interactive Advertising". Journal of Advertising. 34 (2): 57–59. ISSN 0091-3367. doi:10.1080/00913367.2005.10639191. 
^ "Annual U.S. Advertising Expenditure Since 1919". Galbithink.org. September 14, 2008. Archived from the original on April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ Bigat, Ekrem Cetin (1 January 2012). "Guerrilla Advertisement and Marketing". Procedia - Social and Behavioral Sciences. 51: 1022–1029. doi:10.1016/j.sbspro.2012.08.281. 
^ Culotta, Aron; Cutler, Jennifer (22 February 2016). "Mining Brand Perceptions from Twitter Social Networks". Marketing Science. 35 (3): 343–362. ISSN 0732-2399. doi:10.1287/mksc.2015.0968. 
^ "The Complete List of Domain Parking Companies". Parkmynames.com. Retrieved December 15, 2014. 
^ a b Tess Diaz (April 15, 2014). "Domain Name Leasing: A Growing Business Model". MediaOptions.com. Retrieved December 15, 2014. 
^ "ICANN Whois Database". ICANN.org. Retrieved December 15, 2014. 
^ "Commercial Acting - Science of the Business". Socialbilitty. February 17, 2017. Retrieved February 18, 2017. 
^ "Executive summary: Advertising Expenditure Forecasts" (PDF). ZenithOptimedia. December 2015. Archived from the original (PDF) on August 4, 2016. 
^ a b "A Super Bowl Ad Really Is Worth $4 Million". Forbes. 2014-01-29. 
^ "Yes, A Super Bowl Ad Really Is Worth $4 Million". Forbes. 2014-01-29. 
^ McCarthy, Michael (October 17, 2002). "Digitally inserted ads pop up more in sports". usatoday.Com. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ Keith Mcarthur. "Business". globeandmail.com. Archived from the original on March 16, 2006. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ "Canwestmediaworks.com". Canwestmediaworks.com. Retrieved August 23, 2010. 
^ Planman Stars and Brandmagic.tv bring Virtual Advertising to Cricket[permanent dead link]
^ "ADVision – Full motion virtual advertising –". Orad.tv. Retrieved January 18, 2014. 
^ Advertising's Twilight Zone: That Signpost Up Ahead May Be a Virtual Product – New York Times
^ "Welcome to E-Commerce Times". Ecommercetimes.com. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ "What is Native Advertising?". Digital Marketer. Retrieved September 8, 2015. 
^ Marc Ostrofsky (2011). "Get Rich Click!: The Ultimate Guide to Making Money on the Internet". Free Press, Simon and Schuster. Retrieved December 15, 2014. 
^ Eytan Elbaz (April 22, 2013). "Ten Years Later – Lessons from the Applied Semantics Google Acquisition". Allthingsd.com. Retrieved December 15, 2014. 
^ "Extreme advertising: how advertisers push the limits". copywritercollective.com. Retrieved September 8, 2015. 
^ "How Americans get their news". American Press Institute. March 17, 2014. Retrieved December 14, 2015. 
^ Oberoi, Ankit. "The History of Online Advertising". AdPush. Retrieved April 28, 2016. 
^ Wasserman, Todd. "This is the World's First Banner Ad". Mashable. Retrieved April 28, 2016. 
^ Bennet, Mike (2015). A Brief History of Science with Levity. p. 301. ISBN 978 1784622954. 
^ "Overview of Trademark Law". Harvard Law School.  "Under some circumstances, terms that are not originally generic can become generic over time (a process called "genericity"), and thus become unprotected."
^ "Pepsi's bus stop ad in London might be the best use of augmented reality yet". Blippar. The Verge, Jacob Kastrenakes. Retrieved March 25, 2014. 
^ "Trends & Numbers". Newspaper Association of America. March 14, 2012. Archived from the original on December 18, 2014. Retrieved September 18, 2012. 
^ "Interactive – VOD" Archived March 26, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. "Comcast Spotlight website". Retrieved October 5, 2006. Archived March 26, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ Lotich, Bob. "What Is Google Adsense & How Does It Work?". bloggingyourpassion.com. Retrieved 19 September 2016. 
^ a b "Who's Buying What at Super Bowl 2007". Advertising Age. Retrieved May 10, 2010. 
^ Elliott, Stuart (February 8, 2010). "Do-It-Yourself Super Ads". New York Times. Retrieved May 10, 2010. 
^ Horovitz, Bruce (December 31, 2009). "'Two nobodies from nowhere' craft winning Super Bowl ad". USA Today. Retrieved May 10, 2010. 
^ "Zooppa.com, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg". www.bloomberg.com. Retrieved 2017-04-30. 
^ Moskowitz, Robert (May 10, 2006). "Are Consumer-Generated Ads Here to Stay?". iMediaConnection. Archived from the original on April 26, 2010. Retrieved May 10, 2010. 
^ Global marketing Management, 2004, pp. 13–8
^ Young, p.131
^ Howard, Theresa (October 10, 2005). "USA Today, October 9, 2005". Usatoday.com. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 12, 2005). "Madison Ave. Lights Up". Fortune. 
^ http://realitytvmagazine.sheknows.com/2011/05/09/survivor-jeff-probst-says-product-placement-is-here-to-stay/
^ Avery, James (1992-08-01). "Student-Run Advertising Agency: A Showcase for Student Work.". 
^ Taylor, John (1978). How to start and succeed in a business of your own. p. 293. 
^ Altstiel, Tom, and Jean Grow. Advertising Strategy: Creative Tactics From the Outside/In. CA: Sage Publication Inc. 2006. Print.
^ McQueen, Josh (2012). Building Brand Trust. United States of America: Xlibris Corporation. p. 33. ISBN 978-1-4771-0500-9. 
^ "Slashdot | ISP Operator Barry Shein Answers Spam Questions". Interviews.slashdot.org. March 3, 2003. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ "How Marketers Target Kids". Web.archive.org. Archived from the original on April 16, 2009. Retrieved January 18, 2014. 
^ Gussow, Joan (March 2, 1972). "Counternutritional Messages of TV Ads Aimed at Children". Journal of Nutrition Education: 48–52. 
^ "First Lady to Food Companies: Make Healthier Ads for Kids Now". CBS News. Retrieved April 20, 2015. 
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on May 7, 2016. Retrieved May 6, 2016. 
^ a b UK_advertising (2016-01-15). "Marketing and Advertising: The Law". Her Majesty's Stationery Office. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ "Advertising Standards Authority". Advertising Standards Authority. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ Advertising Standards Authority of South Africa: About Us, retrieved 2010-07-05 
^ "About Regulation Our Framework". ASA.org.uk. Archived from the original on October 7, 2015. Retrieved October 5, 2015. 
^ "What happens if an advertisement is displayed without the necessary consent?". PlanningGuidance.PlanningPortal.gov.uk. Retrieved 2015-10-05. 
^ "Welcome to SCRUB". Urbanblight.org. Archived from the original on April 22, 2009. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ "How the Highway Beautification Act Became a Law". Fhwa.dot.gov. Archived from the original on June 4, 2009. Retrieved April 20, 2009. 
^ "Billboard ban in São Paulo angers advertisers – Americas – International Herald Tribune". International Herald Tribune. December 12, 2006. Retrieved January 20, 2014. 
^ Bhatia and Ritchie 2006:542
^ "Advertising – Tax Included in Price". Department of Revenue, Washington State. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ "Advertising Requirements". Travel Industry Council of Ontario. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ "Pricing". Consumer Protection. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ ACCC. "Displaying Prices". Australian Competition and Consumer Commission. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ "Relevant Code Rule". Advertising Standards Authority. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ "Display of Prices for Goods and Services". Citizens Information. 2016-05-31. Retrieved 2016-09-05. 
^ Littlejohn, Stephen W., ed. (2009). "Advertising Theories". Encyclopedia of Communication Theory. 1. SAGE. p. 19. ISBN 978-1-4129-5937-7. Retrieved August 16, 2013. Originally developed in the personal-selling literature, the hierarchy-of-effects model has undergone various modifications in its historical development such that today we use it in the plural form, indicating that competing models exist. 
^ Clow, Kenneth E.; Baack, Donald (2007). Integrated Advertising, Promotion, and Marketing Communications 3rd edition. Pearson Education. pp. 165–71. ISBN 0-13-186622-2.
^ Reynolds, Thomas J.; Olson, Jerry C. (2001-05-01). Understanding Consumer Decision Making: The Means-end Approach To Marketing and Advertising Strategy. Psychology Press. p. 3. ISBN 9781135693169. 
^ McCarthy, Jerome E. (1964). Basic Marketing. A Managerial Approach. Homewood, IL: Irwin. 
^ Needham, Dave (1996). Business for Higher Awards. Oxford, England: Heinemann. 
^ Schultz, Don E; Tannenbaum, Stanley I; Lauterborn, Robert F (1993), Integrated marketing communications, NTC Business Books, ISBN 978-0-8442-3363-5 
^ Shimizu, Koichi (1989) "Advertising Theory and Strategies", (Japanese) first edition, Souseisha Book Company in Tokyo. (ISBN 4-7944-2030-7 C3034 P3980E) pp. 63–102.
^ Shimizu, Koichi (2014) "Advertising Theory and Strategies", (Japanese) 18th edition, Souseisha Book Company (ISBN 4-7944-2132-X C3034) pp. 63–102.
^ Solis, Brian (2011) Engage!: The Complete Guide for Brands and Businesses to Build, Cultivate, and Measure Success in the New Web, John Wiley & Sons, Inc. pp. 201–202.
^ Shimizu, Koichi (2003) "Symbiotic Marketing Strategy", (Japanese) 4th edition, Souseisha Book Company.(ISBN 4-7944-2158-3 C3034) pp. 25–62.
^ "CopyTesting.org". www.copytesting.org. Retrieved 2017-02-13. 
^ Peeter Verlegh, Hilde Voorveld, and Martin Eisend, eds. Advances in Advertising Research (Vol. VI): The Digital, the Classic, the Subtle, and the Alternative (Springer, 2015).
^ Mick, Devid Glen (September 1986). "Consumer Research and Semiotics: Exploring the Morphology of Signs, Symbols, and Significance". The Journal of Consumer Research. 13 (2): 196. doi:10.1086/209060. 
^ Beasley, Ron (2002). Persuasive Signs: The Semiotics of Advertising. Berlin, Germany: Walter deGruyter GmbH & KG. ISBN 3-11-017341-7. 
^ Pinson, Christian (1998). Marketing Semiotics (PDF). 
^ Umiker-Sebeok, Donna Jean (1987). Marketing and Semiotics. Berlin: Walter de Gruyter & Co. 
^ Salsburey, Justin. "Semiotic analysis of iPod Advertisements". 
^ Ademola, Owolabi (2005). "Effects of Gender-Role Orientation, Sex of Advert Presenter and Product Type on Advertising Effectiveness". European Journal of Scientific Research. 35 (4): 537–543. 
^ Koc, Erdogan (2002). "Impact of gender in marketing communications: the role of cognitive and affective cues". Journal of Marketing Communications. 8 (4): 257. doi:10.1080/13527260210145993. 
^ Holbrook, Morris (November 1978). "Beyond Attitude Structure: Toward the Informational Determinants of Attitude". Journal of Marketing Research. 15 (4): 545. JSTOR 3150624. doi:10.2307/3150624. 
^ Silverman, Julian; King, Catherine (1970). "Pseudoperceptual defferentiation". Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology. 34 (1): 119–23. PMID 5436459. doi:10.1037/h0028807. 
^ "Female Celebrities Still Can't Break Through the Glass Ceiling of Voice-over Work". 
^ Chandler, Daniel; Griffiths, Merris (2010). "Gender-Differentiated Production Features in Toy Commercials". Journal of Broadcasting & Electronic Media. 44 (3): 503. doi:10.1207/s15506878jobem4403_10. 
^ Statt, David (1977). Understanding the Consumer – A Psychological Approach. London: Macmillan Press. 
^ Vestergaard and Schrøder, The Language of Advertising, 75
^ "Advertising Sets Impossible Standards for Women". The Balance. Retrieved 2017-05-07. 
^ Splendora, "Discourse", Review of Vestergaard and Schrøder, The Language of Advertising in Language in Society, 449
^ Martin, Brett A. S. (2003), "The Inﬂuence of Gender on Mood Effects in Advertising", Psychology and Marketing,20 (3), 249–73.[dead link]
^ "Ads That Empower Women Don’t Just Break Stereotypes—They’re Also Effective". Retrieved 2017-05-07. 
^ "OUR EPIC BATTLE #LIKEAGIRL". always.com. Retrieved 2017-05-07. 


Further reading[edit]


Arens, William, and Michael Weigold. Contemporary Advertising: And Integrated Marketing Communications (2012)
Belch, George E., and Michael A. Belch. Advertising and Promotion: An Integrated Marketing Communications Perspective (10th ed. 2014)
Biocca, Frank. Television and Political Advertising: Volume I: Psychological Processes (Routledge, 2013)
Chandra, Ambarish, and Ulrich Kaiser. "Targeted advertising in magazine markets and the advent of the internet." Management Science 60.7 (2014) pp: 1829–1843.
Chen, Yongmin, and Chuan He. "Paid placement: Advertising and search on the internet*." The Economic Journal 121#556 (2011): F309-F328. online
Johnson-Cartee, Karen S., and Gary Copeland. Negative political advertising: Coming of age (2013)
McAllister, Matthew P. and Emily West, eds. HardcoverThe Routledge Companion to Advertising and Promotional Culture (2013)
McFall, Elizabeth Rose Advertising: a cultural economy (2004), cultural and sociological approaches to advertising
Moriarty, Sandra, and Nancy Mitchell. Advertising & IMC: Principles and Practice (10th ed. 2014)
Okorie, Nelson. The Principles of Advertising: concepts and trends in advertising (2011)
Reichert, Tom, and Jacqueline Lambiase, eds. Sex in advertising: Perspectives on the erotic appeal (Routledge, 2014)
Sheehan, Kim Bartel. Controversies in contemporary advertising (Sage Publications, 2013)
Vestergaard, Torben and Schrøder, Kim. The Language of Advertising. Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1985. ISBN 0-631-12743-7

Splendora, Anthony. "Discourse", a Review of Vestergaard and Schrøder, The Language of Advertising in Language in Society Vol. 15, No. 4 (Dec., 1986), pp. 445–449



History[edit]
Main article: History of advertising § Further reading

Brandt, Allan. The Cigarette Century (2009)
Crawford, Robert. But Wait, There's More!: A History of Australian Advertising, 1900–2000 (2008)
Ewen, Stuart. Captains of Consciousness: Advertising and the Social Roots of Consumer Culture. New York: McGraw-Hill, 1976. ISBN 0-07-019846-2
Fox, Stephen R. The mirror makers: A history of American advertising and its creators (University of Illinois Press, 1984)
Friedman, Walter A. Birth of a Salesman (Harvard University Press, 2005), In the United States
Jacobson, Lisa. Raising consumers: Children and the American mass market in the early twentieth century (Columbia University Press, 2013)
Jamieson, Kathleen Hall. Packaging the presidency: A history and criticism of presidential campaign advertising (Oxford University Press, 1996)
Laird, Pamela Walker. Advertising progress: American business and the rise of consumer marketing (Johns Hopkins University Press, 2001.)
Lears, Jackson. Fables of abundance: A cultural history of advertising in America (1995)
Liguori, Maria Chiara. "North and South: Advertising Prosperity in the Italian Economic Boom Years." Advertising & Society Review (2015) 15#4
Meyers, Cynthia B. A Word from Our Sponsor: Admen, Advertising, and the Golden Age of Radio (2014)
Mazzarella, William. Shoveling smoke: Advertising and globalization in contemporary India (Duke University Press, 2003)
Moriarty, Sandra, et al. Advertising: Principles and practice (Pearson Australia, 2014), Australian perspectives
Nevett, Terence R. Advertising in Britain: a history (1982)
Oram, Hugh. The advertising book: The history of advertising in Ireland (MOL Books, 1986)
Presbrey, Frank. "The history and development of advertising." Advertising & Society Review (2000) 1#1 online
Saunders, Thomas J. "Selling under the Swastika: Advertising and Commercial Culture in Nazi Germany." German History (2014): ghu058.
Short, John Phillip. "Advertising Empire: Race and Visual Culture in Imperial Germany." Enterprise and Society (2014): khu013.
Sivulka, Juliann. Soap, sex, and cigarettes: A cultural history of American advertising (Cengage Learning, 2011)
Spring, Dawn. "The Globalization of American Advertising and Brand Management: A Brief History of the J. Walter Thompson Company, Proctor and Gamble, and US Foreign Policy." Global Studies Journal (2013). 5#4
Stephenson, Harry Edward, and Carlton McNaught. The Story of Advertising in Canada: A Chronicle of Fifty Years (Ryerson Press, 1940)
Tungate, Mark. Adland: a global history of advertising (Kogan Page Publishers, 2007.)
West, Darrell M. Air Wars: Television Advertising and Social Media in Election Campaigns, 1952–2012 (Sage, 2013)


External links[edit]

Find more aboutAdvertisingat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata




Library resources about
Advertising





Resources in your library
Resources in other libraries





Advertising Educational Foundation, archived advertising exhibits and classroom resources
Hartman Center for Sales, Advertising & Marketing History at Duke University

Duke University Libraries Digital Collections:

Ad*Access, over 7,000 U.S. and Canadian advertisements, dated 1911–1955, includes World War II propaganda.
Emergence of Advertising in America, 9,000 advertising items and publications dating from 1850 to 1940, illustrating the rise of consumer culture and the birth of a professionalized advertising industry in the United States.
AdViews, vintage television commercials
ROAD 2.0, 30,000 outdoor advertising images
Medicine & Madison Avenue, documents advertising of medical and pharmaceutical products




Art & Copy, a 2009 documentary film about the advertising industry







v
t
e


Product advertising






Alcohol advertising
Cosmetic advertising
Fast food advertising
Gambling advertising
Legal advertising
Mobile phone content advertising
Tobacco advertising
Toy advertising












v
t
e


Media manipulation



Context



Bias
Crowd psychology
Deception
Dumbing down
False balance
Half-truths
Machiavellianism
Media
Obfuscation
Orwellian
Persuasion
Psychological manipulation





Activism



Alternative media
Boycott
Civil disobedience
Culture jamming
Demonstrations
Guerrilla communication
Hacktivism
Internet
Media
Occupations
Petitions
Protests
Youth





Advertising



Billboards
False
Infomercials
Mobiles
Modeling
Radio
Sex
Slogans
Testimonials
TV








Censorship
Regulation






Books
Broadcast law
Burying of scholars
Cover-ups
Corporate
Euphemism
Films
Historical revisionism
Internet
Political
Religious
Self





Hoaxing



Alternative facts
April Fools'
Fakelore
Fake news website
Fictitious entries
Forgery
Gaslighting
List
Literary
Racial
Urban legend
Virus





Marketing



Branding
Loyalty
Product
Product placement
Publicity
Research
Word of mouth





News media



Agenda-setting
Broadcasting
Circus
Cycle
False balance
Fox News
MSNBC
CNN
Huffington Post
Infotainment
Managing
Narcotizing dysfunction
Newspeak
Pseudo-event
Scrum
Sensationalism
Tabloid journalism





Political campaigning



Advertising
Astroturfing
Attack ad
Canvassing
Character assassination
Charm offensive
Dog-whistle politics
Election promises
Lawn signs
Manifestos
Name recognition
Negative
Push polling
Smear campaign
Wedge issue





Propaganda



Bandwagon
Crowd manipulation
Disinformation
Fearmongering
Framing
Indoctrination
Loaded language
Lying press
National mythology
Techniques





Psychological warfare



Airborne leaflets
False flag
Fifth column
Information (IT)
Lawfare
Political
Public diplomacy
Sedition
Subversion





Public relations



Cult of personality
Doublespeak
Non-apology apology
Reputation management
Slogans
Sound bites
Spin
Transfer
Understatement
Weasel words





Sales



Cold calling
Door-to-door
Phone
Pricing
Product demonstrations
Promotional merchandise
Promotion












v
t
e


Media culture



Media



Mass media
Mainstream media
24-hour news cycle
Corporate media
News broadcasting
News media
Film
Internet
Radio
Television





Ideology



Mainstream
Advanced capitalism
American Dream
Bipartisanship
Consumerism
Pensée unique
Pop music





Deception





Forms




Advertising
Propaganda
Public relations
Spin
Tabloid journalism






Techniques




Cult of personality
Dumbing down
Framing
Media circus
Media event
Narcotizing dysfunction
Recuperation
Sensationalism






Others




Crowd manipulation
Managing the news
Media manipulation








Philosophers



Theodor W. Adorno
Jean Baudrillard
Edward Bernays
Noam Chomsky
Guy Debord
Walter Lippmann
Marshall McLuhan





Counterculture



Boycott
Civil disobedience
Culture jamming
Demonstration
Graffiti
Occupation
Political satire
Protest
Punk
Strike action





In academia



Influence of mass media
Media studies
Semiotic democracy
The Lonely Crowd





Issues



Anonymity
Concentration of media ownership
Freedom of speech
Media bias
Privacy





Synonyms



Advanced capitalism
Culture industry
Mass society
Post-Fordism
Society of the Spectacle












v
t
e


Aspects of capitalism
(academic views)



General



Business cycle
Competition
Economic bubble
Economic development
Entrepreneurship
Ecoprenuership
Externalities
Globalization
History of capitalist theory
Industrial Revolution
Innovation
Invention
Market failure
Merit
Multinational corporation
Oligopoly
Privatization
Profit
Property rights
Regulation
Wage labour
Wealth





Ideology



American Dream
Bipartisanship
Democracy
Free market
Individualism
Laissez-faire
Libertarianism
Neoliberalism





Cultural aspects



Culture of capitalism
Advertising
Consumerism
Decentralization
Economic mobility
Liberty
Mainstream
Philanthropy
Private foundation
Rule of law
Social alienation
Spontaneous order





Social aspects



Economic inequality
Employment
Freedom of association
Labour market flexibility
Labour supply
Productivity
Prosperity
Social venture capital
Unemployment





Criticism



Criticism
Anti-capitalism
Market fundamentalism
Marxism
Wage slavery





Antithesis



Anarchism
Anarcho-syndicalism
Communism
Eco-socialism
Libertarian socialism
Mercantilism
Post-scarcity economy
Sharing economy
Social anarchism
Socialism
Syndicalism









Authority control



GND: 4065541-6
BNF: cb13318427c (data)
HDS: 14058
NDL: 00566302










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Advertising&oldid=793013768"					
Categories: AdvertisingBranding companiesCommunication designInternet advertising services and affiliate networksMedia manipulation techniquesProduct designHidden categories: Webarchive template archiveis linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksWebarchive template wayback linksArticles with dead external links from February 2017Wikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use mdy dates from January 2014Self-contradictory articles from January 2017All self-contradictory articlesAccuracy disputes from May 2016All accuracy disputesAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from December 2014Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Articles with disputed statements from January 2017Accuracy disputes from January 2017Wikipedia articles that may have off-topic sectionsArticles that may contain original research from April 2012All articles that may contain original researchArticles with unsourced statements from April 2012All articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from September 2010Articles needing additional references from December 2014All articles needing additional referencesArticles that may contain original research from December 2014Articles that may contain original research from February 2016All articles lacking reliable referencesArticles lacking reliable references from April 2015Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Vague or ambiguous time from April 2015Wikipedia articles needing factual verification from February 2017Wikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiersArticles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikibooksWikiquote 



Languages


العربيةAragonésঅসমীয়াAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБашҡортсаБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаCebuanoČeštinaChavacano de ZamboangaChiShonaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisFryskFurlanGaeilgeGalegoગુજરાતી한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתBasa Jawaಕನ್ನಡქართულიҚазақшаKurdîКыргызчаLatinaLatviešuMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംमराठीBahasa MelayuМонголNederlandsनेपालीनेपाल भाषा日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPatoisPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSeelterskSicilianuසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaతెలుగుไทยТоҷикӣTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوئۇيغۇرچە / UyghurcheTiếng ViệtVõroWalonייִדיש粵語中文Kabɩyɛ 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 30 July 2017, at 02:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








	Advertising, Branding, Consumer Insight, Digital, Marketing, PR, Design, Media - WPP











































Follow us | 
Contact us | 
New business enquiries | 
Privacy policy | 
Cookies | 
Group intranet

Search


          
        Go




Home
About Us
Sustainability
Our Companies
Press Centre
Investor Centre
Reading Room
Careers
WPPED Cream















Search our companies





 








                     Go 
                





                    Advanced Search >
                









Annual Report 2016 
Code of Business Conduct 
Sustainability Report 2016/2017 
Financial News 
Group History 
Graduate Opportunities 
Press Releases 
The Store 
What We Do 
WPP Digital 






Stock quote




uk
                1564.69 
            




us
                102.87
            







Last updated at: 17:27 GMT 
Detailed price information







Welcome to WPP: A world leader in marketing communications
WPP companies exist to help their clients compete successfully: in marketing strategy, advertising, every form of marketing communication and in monitoring progress. More..














Reading room






                            Amazon Spark
                        



                            New Facebook Messenger Ads
                        



                            Amazon Prime Day
                        



                            MEC @ Cannes 2017
                        



                            Speak Easy Report
                        









Latest news


                            tenthavenue invests in urban innovation firm LOOM Media in the US
                        
01 August


                            WPP invests in VR/AR company Within Unlimited in the US
                        
26 July


                            Grey acquires full-service digital agency Sensio in France
                        
20 July


                            WPP agrees to acquire creative agency group, thjnk AG, in Germany
                        
13 July

















JORNAL I - KIM,
                    Y&R - Lisbon











WPP is a world leader in advertising and marketing services. 

© 1999-2017
Terms & conditions
                    |
                
Accessibility
                    |
                
e.wire news bulletin
                    |
                
Site Map





                        Twitter
                    



                        Facebook
                    



                        Google+
                    



                        LinkedIn
                    



                        YouTube
                    



                        Mobile  
                    










Advertising Media Planning and Strategy - Internet Advertising - Advertising Agencies





Advertising, Marketing, and Property Management
All types of business need advertising and marketing assistance to help generate awareness, interest, and ultimately, profit. Obviously the Internet has changed the landscape of advertising by adding another media form, the presence of which appears to be everywhere.
Property Management Case Study
The way we use the Internet has changed. And the way Google—by far the most dominant search engine—leads us to web pages has also changed. With that in mind, we’ve decided to create a case study in the property management vertical. Just how much does domain name matter? Are links really all that important? What about content? What about TLDs (top-level domains)?
So, starting from ground zero, we’re setting out to determine what matters when you’re trying to get a website business up and running.  Why property management? We chose this vertical partly because we have experience in the field of lead generation for property management companies. So we’re familiar with the players, the content required, and business issues. We also chose it because it’s an appropriate mid-sized market. 
An important question for us is how quickly can we get a website up, running, and generating leads, using minimal time and money.
With that in mind, we’ve selected ten domain names, with varying TLDs. Of the ten, six have .org TLDS. Five of the domains contain a “geo” for major US cities, on the assumption that you are more likely to rank higher using a term because they filter out competition from irrelevant locations. These domains are: Portland (propertymanagementportland.org), Houston (propertymanagementhouston.org), Atlanta (propertymanagementatlanta.org), Chicago (chicagopropertymanagement.org), and San Diego (sandiegopropertymanagement.org). And one .org domain is a general domain, propertymanagmentcompanies.org.
The remaining four domains are a bit of an experiment using the .co, .management, and .net TLDs. They also contain a “geo” designation for a major US city: Denver (propertymanagementdenver.net), Utah (propertymanagementutah.org), Tucson (tucsonproperty.management), and Orlando (propertymanagementorlando.co).
Stay tuned as we explore the most efficient and cost effective ways to get traffic to websites.
Advertising Media Planning: A Primer
1. Introduction 
The two basic tasks of marketing communications are message creation and message dissemination. Media planning supports message dissemination. Media planning helps you determine which media to use--be it television programs, newspapers, bus-stop posters, in-store displays, banner ads on the Web, or a flyer on Facebook. It also tells you when and where to use media in order to reach your desired audience. Simply put, media planning refers to the process of selecting media time and space to disseminate advertising messages in order to accomplish marketing objectives. When advertisers run commercials during the Super Bowl game at more than $2.5 million per thirty-second spot, for example, media planners are involved in the negotiation and placement.
Media planners often see their role from a brand contact perspective. Instead of focusing solely on what medium is used for message dissemination, media planners also pay attention to how to create and manage brand contact. Brand contact is any planned and unplanned form of exposure to and interaction with a product or service. For example, when you see an ad for Volkswagen on TV, hear a Mazda's "zoom zoom" slogan on the radio, are told by a friend that her iPod is the greatest invention, or sample a a new flavor of Piranha energy drink at the grocery store, you are having a brand contact. Television commercials, radio ads, and product sampling are planned forms of brand contact. Word of mouth is an unplanned brand contact -- advertisers normally do not plan for word of mouth. From the consumer's perspective, however, unplanned forms of brand contact may be more influential because they are less suspicious compared to advertising. 
The brand contact perspective shows how the role of media planners has expanded. First, media planners have moved from focusing only on traditional media to integrating traditional media and new media. New media -- cable and satellite television, satellite radio, business-to-business e-media, consumer Internet, movie screen advertising and videogame advertising -- is playing an increasingly significant role. Spending on new advertising media is forecast to grow at a compound annual rate of 16.9 percent from 2005-2009, reaching $68.62 billion by 2009, while traditional media advertising is expected to rise only 4.2 percent on a compound annual basis during the same period to $192.28 billion.[1] 
Second, media planners are making more use of product placements now, in lieu of advertising insertions. Advertising insertions, like print ads or television commercials, are made separately from the content and are inserted into it. The ads are distinct from the articles or TV programs, not a part of them. As a result, the ads seem intrusive. In contrast, product placement (also called brand placement or branded entertainment) blends product information with the content itself. Whether content is a television program, movie, video game or other form of entertainment, product placement puts the brand message into the entertainment content. For example, in the movie E.T., the extraterrestrial eats Reese's Pieces candy. The candy was authentically integrated into the movie ?and sales of Reese's Pieces soared 80% after the movie, catapulting the new product to mainstream status.[2] On the other hand, inappropriate or excessive product placements may do more harm than good to the brand. 
Finally, the role of media planners has expanded as media planners have moved beyond planned messages to take advantage of unplanned messages as well. Whereas planned messages are what advertisers initiate -- like an ad, press release or sales promotion -- unplanned messages are often initiated by people and organizations other than advertisers themselves. Word of mouth, both online and offline, is one form of unplanned message. Although advertisers have little direct control over the flow of unplanned messages, they can facilitate such a flow. 
For example, advertising agency Crispin Porter + Bogusky (CP+B) created a viral marketing mascot, the Subservient Chicken, for Burger King to illustrate its slogan "Have It Your Way." Visitors to the www.subservientchicken.com site can ask the chicken to make a move, such as jump, dance or lay an egg. In the first two weeks after the site's launch, the Subservient Chicken story appeared on 63 broadcast segments, including five separate segments in television shows unplanned success.[3] Within months, the site had generated 426 million hits from 15 million unique visitors averaging six minutes per session.[4] Many visitors learned about the site through word of mouth, both online and offline. More recently, specialized agencies have started to hire word of mouth agents to work for advertisers on a fee basis. Initial research suggests that many consumers react positively to this kind of word of mouth communication.[5] For example, Rock Bottom brew pub chain, reported a 76% jump in 2003 revenues after hired gun Bzz-Agent launched a 13-week word of mouth campaign employing 1,073 of its "agents" to get the word out.[6]
These new approaches have altered how media planning works in the advertising process. "Seven years ago media was the last five minutes of the presentation. Now it's reversed," said Rishad Tobaccowala of Publicis Groupe Media, whose fast-growing Starcom division helps clients buy and measure interactive, mobile, and gaming ads.[7] Media planners are playing an increasingly important role in today's advertising industry because of the continuing proliferation of new media options and the increased complexity of media and audience research.
2. Media Objectives
How is a media plan developed? Media planning is a four-step process which consists of 1) setting media objectives in light of marketing and advertising objectives, 2) developing a media strategy for implementing media objectives, 3) designing media tactics for realizing media strategy, and 4) proposing procedures for evaluating the effectiveness of the media plan.            
Let's take a look at the planning process through an example: P&G's launch of the Gillette Fusion shaving system for men in early 2006. First, P&G's media objectives called for a $200 million media blitz to reach men in the U.S. 
Second, P&G's strategy included a mix of national media to introduce the brands. For example, television advertising, such as a $5 million Super Bowl ad campaign, portrayed Fusion as an advanced technology found in a secret government UFO lab. The TV ads also established the brand's signature orange and blue color scheme. In store aisles, 180,000 display units promoted Fusion, using the brand's colors to catch consumers' attention. "We're trying to put the product wherever men shop," said Pauline Munroe, marketing director for blades and razors in P&G's Gillette business unit.[8] 
Third, P&G's media tactics -- such as a Father's Day sweepstakes, an episode of NBC's The Apprentice in which the show's teams competed to promote the razor, and sponsorship of competitive surfing -- helped the company reach men of all ages. "Fusion will get so much attention that it will drive a lot of men to try these grooming products," said Gary Stibel of New England Consulting Group.[9] Finally, P&G used sales and market share targets to assess the effectiveness of the media plan. P&G expects sales of Fusion to reach $1 billion in sales by year three.[10] P&G knows that the brand has already achieved 25% market share in the U.S. Thus, although $200 million seems like a lot to spend on advertising a new product, it represents a sound financial investment toward the tremendous future profit that P&G will gain from the new shaving system.
Now, let's take a deeper look into the media planning process. Media planning, such as planning the marketing communications for the launch of the Fusion new shaving system, starts with setting media objectives. Media objectives usually consist of two key components: target audience and communication goals. The target audience component of the media objectives defines who is the intended target of the campaign. For example, P&G's target audience objective for its Fusion shaving system was men 18-40 years old. The communications goals component of the media objectives defines how many of the audience the campaign intends to reach and how many times it will reach them. In short, media objectives are a series of statements that specify what exactly the media plan intends to accomplish. The objectives represent the most important goals of brand message dissemination, and they are the concrete steps to accomplish marketing objectives. 
The next two sections (2.1. and 2.2.) provide details on target audience and communication goals. You'll learn about sources of data to use to identify your target audience. You'll also learn how to quantify communication plans.
2.1. Target Audience
The first objective of a media plan is to select the target audience: the people whom the media plan attempts to influence through various forms of brand contact. Because media objectives are subordinate to marketing and advertising objectives, it is essential to understand how the target audience is defined in the marketing and advertising objectives. The definition may or may not be exactly the same, depending on the marketing and advertising objectives and strategies.
A common marketing objective is to increase sales by a specific amount. But this marketing objective does not specify a target audience, which is why the media objective is needed.  Consider Kellogg's Corn Flakes and all the different strategies the advertiser could use to increase sales among different target audiences. For example, one target audience might be current customers -- encouraging people who eat one bowl a day to also "munch" the cereal as a snack. Or, the advertiser might target competitors' customers, encouraging them to switch brands. Or, the advertiser might target young adults who are shifting from high sugar "kids cereals" to more adult breakfast fare. Finally, the advertiser could target a broader lower-income demographic. The point is that each campaign could increase sales via a different target audience. 
Marketers analyze the market situation to identify the potential avenues for boosting sales increase and consider how advertising might achieve those aims. If the advertiser chooses to attract competitors' customers -- like what Sprint does to attract users of other wireless services -- the media plan will need to define the target audience to be brand switchers and will then identify reasons to give those potential switchers to switch, such as greater convenience, lower cost, or additional plan features. For example, in 2006 Sprint Nextel ran an ad campaign urging consumers to switch to Sprint because "no one has a more powerful network."[11] 
2.1.1 Demographics and Psychographics
The target audience is often defined in terms of demographics and psychographics. Syndicated research services such as Simmons Market Research Bureau (SMRB or Simmons) and Mediamark Research Inc. (MRI) provide national data on a number of demographics of U.S. consumers, including gender, age, education, household income, marital status, employment status, type of residence, and number of children in the household. Using demographic variables, for example, the target audience of a media plan could be "individuals who are 26-to-45 years old with yearly household income of $50,000 or more" or "all households with children age 3 years or younger." 
Some advertisers believe that demographic definitions of a target audience are too ambiguous, because individual consumers that fit such definitions can be quite different in terms of their brand preference and purchase behavior. For example, think about the students in a media planning class. Even though some of them are the same age and gender, they may like different brands of toothpaste, shampoo, cereal, clothing, and other products. Therefore, media planners use psychographics to refine the definition of the target audience.
Psychographics is a generic term for consumers' personality traits (serious, funny, conservative), beliefs and attitudes about social issues (opinions about abortion, environment, globalization), personal interests (music, sports, movie going), and shopping orientations (recreational shoppers, price-sensitive shoppers, convenience shoppers). Mazda, for example, doesn't define its target audience by age, income or gender, but by psychographic principles. Mazda targets people who have a need for self-expression, are young at heart, and love to drive.[12] 
One psychographic system which media planners often use is called VALS (short for Values And LifestyleS), which was developed by SRI in the 1980s. VALS places U.S. adult consumers into one of eight segments based on their responses to the VALS questionnaire. The eight segments are: Innovators, Thinkers, Achievers, Experiencers, Believers, Strivers, Makers and Survivors. Each segment has a unique set of psychological characteristics. For example, Innovators are "successful, sophisticated, take-charge people with high self-esteem. Because they have such abundant resources, they exhibit all three primary motivations in varying degrees. They are change leaders and are the most receptive to new ideas and technologies. Innovators are very active consumers, and their purchases reflect cultivated tastes for upscale, niche products and services."[13] Defining a target audience by psychographic variables helps not only creative directors with the development of advertising appeals but also media planners with the selection of effective media channels. If a psychographic group of consumers likes playing golf, for example, they are likely to read golf-related magazines and visit golf-related Web sites.
2.1.2. Generational Cohorts
In addition to demographics and psychographics, generational cohort is another useful concept for selecting the target audience. Because the members of a particular generational cohort are likely to have had similar experiences during their formative years, they maintain analogous social views, attitudes, and values. Generational cohorts in the U.S. are the Baby Boomers (about 70 million people born 1945-1964), Generation X (about 17 million people born in 1965-1978), and Generation Y (about 60 million people born between 1979 and 1994). Each of the cohorts possesses distinct characteristics in their lifestyles and often serves as a reference group from which finer segments of the target audiences can be selected for specific advertising campaigns. 
An interesting example of a generational cohort is "kogals" in Japan. Originating from the world for "high school," kogals are a unique segment of young women in urban Japan who conspicuously display their disposable incomes through unique tastes in fashion, music, and social activity. They have the leisure time to invent new ways of using electronic gadgets. For example, they started changing mobile phones' ring tones from boring beeps to various popular songs and changing screen savers from dull defaults to cute pictures. Manufacturers observe kogals and listen to what they say is unsatisfactory about the products. In some cases, manufacturers simply imitate the new usages that kogals spontaneously invented and incorporate these usages part of their own new commercial services, thereby increasing sales.[14]
2.1.3. Product and Brand Usage
Target audiences can also be more precisely defined by their consumption behavior. Product usage includes both brand usage (the use of a specific brand such as Special K cereal or Dove soap) and category usage (the use of a product category such as facial tissue or chewing gum). Product use commonly has four levels: heavy users, medium users, light users and non-users. The levels of use depend on the type of product. For example, Simmons defines heavy domestic beer users as those who consume five or more cans in the past 30 days, medium beer users as those who consumer two to four cans, and light users as those who consume one can in 30 days. For travel, Simmons' definitions are: three foreign trips per year indicate heavy travel users, 2 foreign trips per year are medium travel users, and 1 trip per year are light travel users. There is a popular saying in the industry: "the twenty percent who are heavy users account for eighty percent of the sales of a product." This highlights the importance of heavy users for a brand's performance. Examples of defining a target audience by product usage can be "individuals who dine out at least four times in a month" or "individuals who made domestic trips twice or more last year." 
Similarly, brand usage has several categories. Brand loyals are those who use the same brand all the time. Primary users use a brand most of the time but occasionally also use other brands in the same category; they are secondary users for these competing brands. Brand switchers are those who have no brand preference for a given product category but choose a brand on the basis of situational factors. An analysis of the brand usage pattern is helpful for the identification of the appropriate target audience. Simmons [15] and MRI [16] offer brand usage data for many national brands.
2.1.4. Primary and Secondary Target Audience
The target audience in a media plan can be either primary or secondary. A primary target audience is one that plays a major role in purchase decisions, while a secondary target audience plays a less decisive role. In the case of video game players, for example, children's requests often initiate a purchase process; parents often respect their children's brand selection. Thus, it is reasonable to consider children as the primary target audience and their parents as the secondary target audience. If the parents are aware of the advertised brand, it will be easier for children to convince them of the purchase. Media planners need to examine and identify the role of consumers in shopping, buying and consuming a product or service to target the right groups of consumers effectively. 
2.1.5. The Size of Target Audiences
In the process of defining a target audience, media planners often examine and specify the actual size of a target audience -- how many people or households fit the definition. Knowing the actual size helps advertisers to estimate the potential buying power of the target audience. For example, if the target audience of a campaign is defined as working women 26-to-44 years old who are interested in receiving daily news updates on their mobile phones, media planners should estimate the number of these women in the U.S. to quantify the sales potential. 
As another example, if the target audience consists of 2,000,000 households in the U.S. and each household purchases the brand two times a month, the monthly sales would be 4,000,000 units. The U.S. Census Bureau [17] provides the most authoritative data about demographics of the U.S. population by state. Whereas the U.S. Census provides demographic data, market research services such as Simmons and MRI provide demographic data that is linked to product data. This means that media planners can get information about consumers of hundreds of product types. 
2.2. Communication Goals
  After media planners define the target audience for a media plan, they set communication goals: to what degree the target audience must be exposed to (and interact with) brand messages in order to achieve advertising and marketing objectives. For example, one communication goal can be that 75 percent of the target audience will see the brand in television commercials at least once during a period of three months. Another communication goal is that 25 percent of the target audience will form a preference for a new brand in the first month of the brand launch. The different communication goals can be better understood in a hierarchy of advertising objectives, such as Bill Harvey's expansion of an earlier model of Advertising Research Foundation (ARF).[18] 
The expanded ARF model has ten levels, as shown in Figure 1. The first three levels of goals from the bottom -- vehicle distribution, vehicle exposure, and advertising exposure -- are particularly relevant for media planning. Vehicle distribution refers to the coverage of a media vehicle, such as the number of copies that a magazine or newspaper issue has, or the number of households that can tune in to a given television channel. Vehicle exposure refers to the number of individuals exposed to the media vehicle, such as the number of people who read a magazine or watched a television program. Advertising exposure refers to the number of individuals exposed an ad or a commercial itself. 
It is important to note the difference between vehicle exposure and advertising exposure for many media with editorial content. For example, not all audience members of a television program will watch all the commercials interspersed in the program. A study shows that only 68 percent of television audiences watch the commercials in television programs.[19] Vehicle exposure represents only an opportunity to see an ad, not necessarily that the ad has actually been seen. In reality, advertising exposure is rarely measured, and media planners use vehicle exposure as a proxy measure of advertising exposure.
Another group of communication goals is advertising recall, advertising persuasion, leads and sales. Advertising recall represents the cognitive effect of the ad, advertising persuasion represents the emotional effect of the ad, and leads and sales are the behavioral effects of the ad. Each can be specified in a media plan as a communication goal. For example, a communication goal can specify that 50% of the target audience will recall the radio ad during the month of the campaign, or that a campaign will generate 3000 leads. 
Figure 1
  ARF Model Expanded for Interactive
2.2.1. Reach, Frequency and Gross Rating Points 
Media planners often define the communication goals of a media plan using the three interrelated concepts of reach, gross rating points, and frequency. Media planners use reach to set their objective for the total number of people exposed to the media plan. Reach is one of the most important terms in media planning and has three characteristics. First, reach is a percentage, although the percentage sign is rarely used. When reach is stated, media planners are aware of the size of the target audience. For example, if a media plan targets the roughly 5 million of women who are 18-25 years old, then a reach of 50 means that 50% or 2.5 million of the target audience will exposed to some of the media vehicles in the media plan. Second, reach measures the accumulation of audience over time. Because reach is always defined for a certain period of time, the number of audience members exposed to the media vehicles in a media plan increases over time. For example, reach may grow from 20 (20%) in the first week to 60 (60%) in the fourth week. The pattern of audience accumulation varies depending on the media vehicles in the media plan. Third, reach doesn't double-count people exposed multiple times if the media plan involves repeated ads in one media category or ads in multiple media categories. Media planners use reach because it represents that total number of people exposed to the marketing communication.
Besides reach, media planners use Gross Rating Points as a shorthand measure of the total amount of exposure they want to buy from media outlets such as TV networks. For example, the 2006 Super Bowl game received a rating of 42, which means 42 percent of U.S. television households tuned in to the program. If an advertiser planned to run a commercial once during the Super Bowl, that ad would appear in 42% of households. If the commercial was run only once, the reach is equal to the rating of the program, a GRP of 42. If the advertiser's media plan called for running the ad twice during the Super Bowl, the GRP would be 2*42 = 84.
Media planners often think in terms of gross rating points because ad prices often scale with this measure. As a rule of thumb, it costs about twice as much to obtain a GRP of 84 as to obtain a GRP of 42. A media plan that calls for a GRP of 84 doesn't necessarily mean that the advertiser must advertise twice on the Super Bowl. The advertiser could also buy 6 spots on popular primetime shows that each have a rating of 14 (6*14 = 84) or buy a large number of spots (say 42 spots) on a range of niche-market cable TV programs, radio stations or magazines that have a rating of 2. Some media vehicles are best-suited to specific target audiences. For example, the Nickelodeon TV channel controls 53% of kids GRPs.[20] 
Notice the difference between GRP and reach: GRP counts total exposures while reach counts unique people exposed. Thus, GRP does double-count people who see ads multiple times. Frequency connects the concept of reach with that of GRP. To see this relationship between GRP and reach, let's consider what happens when an advertiser puts two spots on the Super Bowl -- one during the first half of the game and another in the second half. As mentioned earlier, this example plan has a GRP of 84. But what is the reach? That depends on how many people watch both halves of the game. Rating services such as A.C. Nielsen monitor who watches the game, when they watch, and whether they watch the first half or the second half or both halves of the game. 
These rating services know that, for example, 1/3 of the game-watching households stop watching after the first half and 1/3 of game-watching households start watching during the second half. This means that, although 42% of households are tuned in to the game during each half, it's not the same 42% for both halves. Thus, the reach of the first ad is 42, but then one-third of these households (42%*1/3 = 14% of all households) tune out before the second ad during the second half. This means that only 28% of all households watch both first and second halves of the game and see the ad twice. This 28% of households who are still watching when the second spot shows won't add to the reach when they see the second spot. During the second half, a different 14% of U.S. households tune in. These new watchers do count toward the reach during the second half because they didn't see the ad during the first half. Thus, the total reach for the game for the two-ad plan is 42+14 = 56.
Frequency is the ratio of GRP over reach. Frequency is a measure of repetition. The formula of calculating frequency is:
            Frequency = Gross rating points / Reach
Using the Super Bowl example again, if the GRPs were 84 and the reach was 56, then the frequency would then be 1.5 (84/56=1.5). A frequency of 1.5 would mean that, on average, audience members of the Super Bowl game had one-and-a-half opportunities to watch the ad.
The media objectives of a media plan often call for some combination of reach and frequency. Media planners want the highest reach possible because that means more people will be exposed to the campaign, which should lead to more brand awareness, customer loyalty, sales, and so on. Media planners also seek high frequency if they feel that consumers will only take action (that is, buy the product) after multiple exposures to the campaign. For example, launching a new brand or teaching consumers about the features of a product (like the features of a five-bladed shaving system) may take several impressions.
Thus, reach indicates the media dispersion while frequency shows the media repetition. Notice that the formula for frequency can be flipped to make a formula for GRPs; GRPs are the product of reach multiplied by frequency. If a media plan calls for a broad reach and a high frequency, then it calls for very high GRPs (lots of ad exposures to lots of people). Achieving a very high GRP is very expensive, however, and budget issues may preclude such a high GRP. Thus, media planners may start with budget, then estimate the GRPs that they can afford and then either sacrifice reach to maintain frequency or let frequency drop to one in order to maximize reach.
2.2.2. Frequency Distribution, Effective Frequency and Effective Reach 
Media planners also consider frequency distribution in order to fully understand exactly how many exposures different people experience; that is, how many people will see the ad once, twice, three times, etc. This lets the planner estimate the effective reach of the plan at the effective frequency needed by the campaign ?the number of people who see the ads a sufficient number of times for the media plan to be effective. 
Effective frequency refers to the minimum number of media exposures for a communication goal to be achieved, while effective reach is the reach (% of households) at the effective frequency level. Media planners choose an effective frequency based on the communication goals. Communication goals vary across the continuum from awareness, preference, attitude change to trial, purchase, and repurchase. To change brand attitude requires more exposures (higher effective frequency) than does creating brand awareness. If the effective frequency is set for a given communication goal, the reach at that effective frequency level will be the effective reach.
Let's go back to the Super Bowl example. A total of 28% of households see the ad twice by watching the entirety of the game. During the first half, 14% of households see the ad once but then don't watch the second half. Another 14% join the game in progress and see the ad once during the second half. Thus, 14+14 = 28% see the ad just once. This leaves 44% of households (100% - 28% - 28%) who never see the ad. In summary, the frequency distribution is: reach of 28 at the frequency of 2; reach of 28 at the frequency of 1; and reach of 44 at the frequency of 0 (also called non-reach).
Let's extend this example by continuing this hypothetical campaign. On the Thursday after the Super Bowl, the advertiser does one more media blitz ?showing an encore of their Super Bowl ad on all major networks during the prime time slot of 8:00 to 8:30 PM. This practice of advertising on multiple channels at the same time ensures that most people will see the ad regardless of which channel they watch. Table 2 shows the viewer data, collected from households across the country, with the percentage of households who were watching during various combinations of the three time slots.
Table 2
    Ratings of the Three Time Slots



 
Viewers of the Ad's Time Slot 
Data


Segment
Super Bowl First Half
Super Bowl Second Half
Prime Time Blitz
Frequency
% of Households


1
 
 
 
0
30


2
X
 
 
1
3


3
 
X
 
1
2


4
 
 
X
1
14


5
X
X
 
2
5


6
X
 
X
2
11


7
 
X
X
2
12


8
X
X
X
3
23


Rating
42
42
60
 
 



Media planners can process this data to compute the frequency distribution (see Table 3) by tallying the total percentage of households that saw the ad 0, 1, 2, etc. times.
Table 3
    Frequency Distribution of the Plan



Frequency
Reach


0
30


1
19


2
28


3
23



If the advertiser believes that its ads are only effective if they are seen at least twice, then the advertiser will want to know what percentage of households saw the ad two or more times. In this example, the effective reach is 51 because that is the sum of the reaches for frequencies 2 and 3 combined. 
GRPs of this media plan were 144 and reach was 70, because 30% of households did not watch during any of the three times the ad was shown, resulting in an average frequency of 2.1. The frequency distribution of the plan is in Table 9B. That is, 23 percent of the households watched the time slot three times, 28 percent twice, 19 percent once, and 30 percent did not watch at all.
2.2.3. Setting Communication Goals
Media planners can set communication goals based on the level of reach. That is, how many of the target audience should be reached with the media plan, say 50%, 75% or 95%? Theoretically, a reach of 100 is possible, but it is rarely a communication goal because some audience members may not use any of the media, making them unreachable. What, then, would be the optimal level of reach for a given product category or a market situation? There is no quick answer to this question; it all depends on the media planner's analysis of major factors facing the brand. 
Media experts suggest high reach is appropriate when something new is associated with the brand, such as new features, new sales incentives, new packaging or new service opportunities.[21] The newness requires a high level of awareness among the target audience. A high reach is also often necessary in three other situations: a) advertising in support of sales promotion activities, b) for reminder advertising for a mass market product, and c) when the brand faces severe competition.
When setting levels of frequency, media planners have more rules of thumb to choose from when setting levels of reach. For example, media planners have often been setting a frequency of 3 during a purchase cycle, following Michael Naples' seminal study of effective frequency published in 1979.[22] Naples' study suggests that there is a threshold level of repetition; advertising below the threshold level will be ineffective. Therefore, three exposures during a purchase cycle are necessary. Many media planners still use this rule in setting the effective frequency of a media plan.
More recently, Philip Jones found that one exposure generates the highest proportion of sales and that additional exposures add very little to the effect of the first.[23] Erwin Ephron further developed the concept of "recency planning" and suggested that one exposure within a purchase cycle should be set as close to the actual purchase moment as possible.[24] Recency planning starts with the idea that when is more important than how many; That is, advertising will be most effective if it is timed to when a consumer is in the market to buy the product or service. In the short-term, therefore, additional exposures are likely to be wasteful because audience members are not in the buying mode. In some cases, advertisers know when consumers are in the market, such as Wyoming's ads during the spring when many people are planning summer vacations. 
Joseph W. Ostrow created a decision model to help media planners determine the optimal frequency level through assessing marketing factors, copy factors and media factors.[25] Starting with a base effective frequency of 3, the media planner makes frequency adjustments based on a series of 20 factors in three categories. As illustrated in Table 4, each category includes several statements, upon which the media planner makes judgments by circling an appropriate rating in that row of the chart. For example, the first factor asks the planner to rate whether the product is an "Established brand" or "New brand." A totally new brand will require higher frequency than an established brand, and so the planner would circle the "+.2" frequency adjustment. After assessing the factors, the media planner sums the adjustments to calculate the recommended effective frequency. Media planners may modify the model by adding or removing statements to make the estimate more appropriate. 
Table 4
  The Ostrow Model of Effective Frequency



Low Required Frequency
Frequency Adjustment
High Required Frequency


Market Factors


Established brand
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
New brand


High brand share
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low brand share


High brand loyalty
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low brand loyalty


Long purchase cycle
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Short purchase cycle


Less frequent usage
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Frequency usage


Low share of voice
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
High share of voice


Target other group
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Target old people or children


Message Factors


Low message complexity
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
High message complexity


High message uniqueness
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low message uniqueness


Continuing campaign
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
New campaign


Product-focused message
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Image-focused message


Low message variety
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
High message variety


High wearout
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low wearout


Large advertising units
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Small advertising units


Media Factors


Low clutter
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
High clutter


Favorable editorial setting
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Neutral editorial setting


High audience attentiveness
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low audience attentiveness


Continuous scheduling
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Pulse or flight scheduling


Few media vehicles
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
More media vehicles


High repeat exposure media
-.2
-.1
+.1
+.2
Low repeat exposure media



When setting frequency level goals, media planners know that higher-level communication goals such as persuasion and lead generation (as shown in the expanded ARF model in Figure 9A) require higher frequency levels. For example, brand awareness usually requires a lower level of frequency than advertising persuasion and lead generation. In other words, a media plan that intends to change the brand preference among consumers of competing brands would need a higher frequency of advertising exposures than a media plan that intends to introduce a new brand.
In addition to the reach and frequency goals, media planners may set goals for other forms of communication. For example, promotional activities may be used in a media plan, such as sweepstakes, contests and coupons. Media planners estimate and specify response rates for these activities. By establishing communication goals, media planners set the stage for assessing the effectiveness of a media plan at the end.
3. Media Strategies
Media planners make three crucial decisions: where to advertise (geography), when to advertise (timing), and what media categories to use (media mix).  Moreover, they make these decisions in the face of budget constraints. The actual amount of money that an advertiser spends on marketing communications can vary widely, from billions of dollars for multinational giants such as Procter & Gamble, to a few thousand dollars for local "mom-n-pop" stores. In general, companies spend as little as 1% to more than 20% of revenues on advertising, depending on the nature of their business. Regardless of the budget, some media options are more cost effective than others. It is the job of media planners to formulate the best media strategies -- allocating budget across media categories, geographies, and time. Let's look at each of these three decisions in turn, and then consider cost effectiveness. 
3.1. Media Mix Decisions
Which media should the advertiser use? Media planners craft a media mix by considering a budget-conscious intersection between their media objectives and the properties of the various potential media vehicles. That is, they consider how each media vehicle provides a cost-effective contribution to attaining the objectives, and then they select the combination of vehicles that best attain all of the objectives.
When making media mix decisions, planners look to a whole spectrum of media, not just to traditional media vehicles such as TV, radio, and print. That is, media planners consider all the opportunities that consumers have for contact with the brand. These opportunities can be non-traditional brand contact opportunities such as online advertising, sweepstakes, sponsorships, product placements, direct mail, mobile phones, blogs, and podcasts. The scale and situations of media use are especially important when evaluating suitable brand contact opportunities. For example, product placement in a video game makes sense if the target audience plays video games. Sweepstakes make sense if many of the target audience find sweepstakes attractive.
3.1.1 Mix Strategy: Media Concentration vs. Media Dispersion
A media planner's first media mix decision is to choose between a media concentration approach or a media dispersion approach. The media concentration approach uses fewer media categories and greater spending per category. This lets the media planner create higher frequency and repetition within that one media category. Media planners will choose a concentration approach if they are worried that their brand's ads will share space with competing brands, leading to confusion among consumers and failure of the media objectives. For example, when Nestle launched its 99% fat-free cereal Fitnesse, the similarity of ads actually increased the sales of the competing Kellogg's Special K Cereal.[26]
Media planners can calculate or measure share of voice to estimate the dominance of their message in each category of media they use. Share of voice is the percentage of spending by one brand in a given media category relative to the total spending by all brands that are advertising in that media category. 
A company can create a high share of voice with a concentrated media strategy. That is, the company can be the dominant advertiser in a product category in the chosen channel. Moreover, because only one set of creative materials will need to be prepared, a concentrated media strategy lets advertisers spend a higher percentage of their budget on frequency and reach. But a concentrated strategy is also an "all-eggs-in-one-basket" strategy. If the particular ad is not well received or the particular media category only reaches a fraction of the intended target audience, then it will perform poorly.
In contrast, media planners choose a media dispersion approach when they use multiple media categories, such as a combination of television, radio, newspapers and the Internet. Media planners will use dispersion if they know that no single media outlet will reach a sufficient percentage of the target audience. For example, a concentrated approach using only ads on the Internet might reach only 30% of the target consumers because some consumers don't use the Internet. Similarly, a concentrated approach using national news magazines might reach only 30% of the target audience, because not every target customer reads these magazines. But a dispersed approach that advertises in print magazines as well as on Web sites might reach 50% of the target audience. Media planners also like the dispersion approach for the reinforcement that it brings -- consumers who see multiple ads in multiple media for a given brand may be more likely to buy.
Table 5 illustrates the media concentration and media dispersion approaches to the media category allocations for three hypothetical brands of fatigue relief medication. Advertisers of Zipium took a media dispersion approach by allocating the budget relatively evenly across all four media categories, while advertisers of Pepzac and Enerzid took a media concentration approach by spending the budget in one or two media categories.
Table 5
  Hypothetical Media Mix and Share of Voice 



Competing Brand
Television
Magazine
Direct Mail
Internet
Total Spend by Brand


Zipium OTC
$400,000
$250,000
$200,000
$300,000
$1,150,000


Pepzac
$600,000
$250,000
$0
$0
$850,000


Enerzid
$0
$0
$0
$600,000
$600,000


Total Spend by Category
$750,000
$500,000
$200,000
$900,000
$2,600,000


 
Brands' Voice in Each Category


Zipium OTC
40%
50%
100%
33%
44%


Pepzac
60%
50%
0%
0%
33%


Enerzid
0%
0%
0%
67%
23%


Total %
100%
100%
100%
100%
100%



Notice the share of voice figures for the three brands in television. Zipium gets a 40% share of voice in television because it spent $400,000 out of the total of $1 million spent on television advertising by fatigue remedy medications. Pepzac gets 60% because it spent $600,000 out of the $1 million spent on TV. Enerzid receives a 0% share of voice in TV because it spent no money in that media category. Pepzac enjoys a dominant share of voice in television because it has the highest percentage of spending in that category. 
Looking across the other media categories, we see the effects of a concentrated versus dispersed media approach. Although Zipium spends the greatest amount of money, it only achieves dominant share of voice in one of the four media categories due to dispersal. Each of the other brands also dominates one category. For example, Enerzid concentrates all of its spending on the Internet. Thus, although Enerzid has a small budget, it manages to dominate that one category through its concentrated media approach.
The media concentration approach is often preferable for brands that have a small or moderate media budget but intend to make a great impact. For example, GoDaddy.com, an Internet hosting service, bought two spots in the Super Bowl in 2005. Because of the controversial nature of the ad, Fox Networks canceled the second run of the ad. The controversy over the pulled ad resulted in more than $11 million of free publicity.[27] The single paid ad plus heavy media coverage of the incident greatly increased the awareness of GoDaddy.[28] The spot also earned GoDaddy a 51% share of voice, a percentage which some say is the largest share of voice attributed to any Super Bowl advertiser ever.[29]
3.1.2. Media Category Selection
Whether media planners select media concentration or media dispersion, they still must pick the media category(ies) for the media plan. Different media categories suit different media objectives. Most media options can be classified into three broad categories: mass media, direct response media, and point-of-purchase media. A media planner's choice will depend on the media objectives. If the media planner wants to create broad awareness or to remind the largest possible number of consumers about a brand, then he or she will pick mass media such as television, radio, newspaper and magazine. If the media planner wants to build a relationship with a customer or encourage an immediate sales response, then direct response media such as direct mail, the Internet and mobile phone are good choices. 
For example, online ads for car insurance such as link directly to the application process to capture the customers right at the time they are interested in the service. Finally, if media planners want to convert shoppers into buyers, then they might use point-of-purchase media such as sampling, coupons and price-off promotions. In short, each of these three categories of media serve a different role in moving the customer from brand awareness to brand interest to purchase intent to actual purchase and then to re-purchase. An integrated campaign, such as the one described for P&G's Fusion shaving system, might use multiple categories -- combining national TV ads to introduce the product, Internet media to provide one-to-one information, and in-store displays to drive sales.
The creative requirements of a media category also affect media planners' decisions. Each media category has unique characteristics. For example, television offers visual impact that interweaves sight and sound, often within a narrative storyline. Magazines offer high reproduction quality but must grab the consumer with a single static image. Direct mail can carry free samples but can require compelling ad copy in the letter and back-end infrastructure for some form of consumer response by return mail, telephone or Internet. Rich media ads on the Internet can combine the best of TV-style ads with interactive response via a clickthrough to the brand's own Web site. Media planners need to consider which media categories provide the most impact for their particular brand. The costs of developing creative materials specific to each media category can also limit media planners' use of the media dispersion approach.         
3.2. Geographic Allocation Decisions
In addition to allocating advertising by media category, media planners must allocate advertising by geography. In general, a company that sells nationally can take one of three approaches to geographic spending allocation: a national approach (advertise in all markets), a spot approach (advertise only in selected markets), or a combined national plus spot approach (advertise in all markets with additional spending in selected markets). 
Media planners will choose a national approach if sales are relatively uniform across the country, such as for Tide laundry detergent or Toyota automobiles. A national approach will reach a national customer base with a national advertising program. For many other products, however, a company's customers are concentrated in a limited subset of geographic areas, which makes a spot approach more efficient. For example, the sales of leisure boats are much higher in markets such as Florida, California and Michigan due to the large water areas in these markets. A spot approach will target these states. For example, a leisure boat manufacturer such as Sea Ray might use a spot approach to target Florida, California and Michigan while not advertising in other states like Iowa or Nebraska.
Media planners perform geographic analyses by assessing the geographic concentration of sales in two ways. The first method is called the Brand Development Index (BDI) of a geographic region. BDI measures the concentration of sales of a company's brand in that region. 
The second method is called the Category Development Index (CDI) and measures the concentration of sales of the product category (across all brands) in that region. 
Media planners use BDI to measure a brand's performance in a given market in comparison with its average performance in all markets where the brand is sold. Mathematically, BDI is a ratio of a brand's sales in a given geographic market divided by the average of its sales in all markets. BDI is calculated for each geographic area (Market X) using the following formula:
Market X's Share of Total Brand Sales
BDI = ----------------------------------------------- X 100
Market X's Share of U.S. Population
Consider the BDI for visitors to the state of Louisiana -- the geographic concentration of people who travel to Louisiana for business or pleasure. The BDI for Houston is 658 because Houston is 1.8% of the U.S. population, but Houstonians make up 11.8% of visitors to Louisiana (100 * (11.8%/1.8%) = 658). Because Houston's BDI is higher than 100, it means that many more Houstonians come to Louisiana than the average from other cities. In contrast, the New York City area has a very low BDI of only 10 because even though New York City has 7.2% of the U.S. population, this city contributes only 0.7% of visitors to Louisiana.[30] 
This disparity in BDI influences Louisiana's advertising strategy. Media planners will tend to allocate more resources to high BDI markets (greater than 100) than to low BDI markets. The point is that even though New York City has a much larger population, it has a much lower concentration of travelers to Louisiana. Given that the cost of advertising is often proportional to the population it reaches, advertising in New York City will be far more expensive than advertising in Houston. Because such a low percentage of New Yorkers travel to Louisiana, advertising to New Yorkers will be less effective than advertising to Houstonians. 
BDI doesn't tell the whole story, however, because BDI only measures the concentration of current sales. BDI doesn't reflect the concentration of potential sales as measured by sales of the entire product category. So, media planners use another number, CDI, in addition to BDI when allocating resources for spot advertising. CDI is a measure of a product category's performance in a given geographic market in comparison to its average performance in all markets in the country. The sales of a product category include the sales of all the brands (the company's and competitors' brands) or at least all major brands that fall in the category. The CDI formula is:
Market X's Share of Total Category Sales
CDI = ---------------------------------------------------- X 100
Market X's Share of U.S. Population
Notice the similarities and differences of the CDI formula compared to the BDI formula. The denominator of the CDI formula is the same as that of the BDI formula, but the numerator for CDI is the share of the product category in a given market. For example, if the sales of the product category in Market X account for 2 percent of its total sales in the U.S. and the population in that market is 3 percent of the U.S. population, then the CDI for that market will be 67, which is 33 percent below the average of 100. That means a poorer-than-average consumption of the product category, which means that Market X may be less promising for spot market advertising. On the other hand, markets with a high CDI (higher than 100) may be a better market for that product category.
Because BDI and CDI can vary independently, media planners use both numbers to guide allocation decisions. In general, BDI reflects the concentration of existing sales while CDI reflects the concentration of potential sales in a geographic region. Returning to the example of leisure boats, we find that states such as California, Florida, and Michigan have high CDIs. Yet the maker of a line of small boats that aren't suitable for the ocean may have very high BDI in Michigan but a very low BDI in California and Florida. Because a BDI or a CDI for a given market can each be either above or below the average, there will be four possible combinations, as shown in Table 6. The four combinations represent two extreme cases and two mixed cases. At the one extreme, in a market with both a high CDI and a high BDI (both above 100), media planners will seek to maintain high market share (implied by high BDI) and might even consider more advertising to gain market share because of the good category potential (implied by high CDI) of the market. At the other extreme, in a market with both a low CDI and a low BDI, media planners may eschew spending their advertising dollars there due to the low concentration of potential consumption -- the small boat maker may ignore New Mexico.
Table 6
    Four Scenarios of BDI and CDI





CDI


BDI

High
Low


        High
High CDI
            High BDI
Low CDI
            High BDI


Low
High CDI
        Low BDI
Low CDI
        Low BDI



The mixed cases represent situations in which the percentage of brand sales in a region differs significantly from the percentage of category sales. A market with a high CDI and a low BDI deserves serious consideration because it suggests a large opportunity for increased sales. Before devoting advertising dollars, the company will want to understand why it has such poor sales of its brand (low BDI) in an area with high category sales. For example, the maker of small boats may learn that Californians don't buy the brand's boats because the boats are unsuitable for the ocean. If the causes of the poor brand performance can be identified and solved (such as by changing the product or finding better distribution), then more advertising should be worthwhile. 
A low CDI and high BDI represents the enviable position of selling well in a market that does not otherwise buy products in that category. A market with low CDI and a high BDI requires continued advertising support to maintain the superior brand performance. 
One approach to resource allocation uses a weighted sum of BDI and CDI -- spending money in each geography in proportion to a combined BDI plus CDI score. With this approach, media planners need to first assign a weight to the BDI and to the CDI. These two weights represent the relative importance of the BDI and CDI, and the sum of two weights should equal 1. On the one hand, media planners might choose a high weight on CDI if they feel their brand is representative of the broader category and they expect their brand to attain a geographic pattern of sales that matches that of the category. On the other hand, they might place a high weight on BDI if their brand is unique, the category is very diverse, or the company wants to grow sales among current customers. 
Consider a hypothetical example in which a media planner thinks the BDI is three times more important than the CDI in allocating spending. He or she would use a weight of .75 with the BDI values and .25 with the CDI values of each geography to calculate a weighted sum and a percentage for each of the markets. Then, she can use the percentage as a base for spending allocation in each market, as show in Table 7. That is, Market A will receive 16 percent of the media spending, Market B will receive 22 percent, and so on. All the percentages added together will equal 100 percent.
Table 7
    Hypothetical Spending Allocation in Markets with 75% BDI and 25% CDI



Geographic Market
BDI
CDI
75% Weighted 
        BDI
25% Weighted 
        CDI
Weighted
        Sum
Spending
        Percentage


North
74
89
56
22
78
16%


East
111
99
83
25
108
22%


Central
93
129
69
32
102
20%


South
139
109
104
27
131
26%


West
83
74
63
19
81
16%



Media planners can use another index -- growth potential index (GPI) -- to assess growth opportunities in geographic markets. GPI is simply the ratio of the CDI over the BDI and is one way of quantifying the discrepancy between category sales (the potential sales for the market) and brand sales (current sales) to measure of the growth potential of a brand in a market. The formula of the GPI is as follows:
Market X's CDI
GPI = ---------------------- X 100
Market X's BDI
For example, if Market X has a CDI of 120 and a BDI of 80, then the GPI will be 150. This high value of GPI suggests a growth potential of 50% in this market -- that if the brand sold as well in that market as it does nationwide, sales would grow 50%. Of course, media planners should examine the specific conditions of a high GPI market before allocating resources to assess the true possibilities for growth. When a brand sells in many markets, the GPI can facilitate the selection of markets for additional spot advertising spending. 
3.3. Media Schedule Decisions
Having decided how to advertise (the media mix) and where to advertise (allocation across geography), media planners need to consider when to advertise. Given a fixed annual budget, should all months receive equal amounts of money or should some months receive more of the budget while other months receive less or nothing? Media planners can choose among three methods of scheduling: continuity, flight, and pulse. Continuity scheduling spreads media spending evenly across months. For example, with an annual budget of $1,200,000 a year, continuity scheduling would allocate exactly $100,000 per month. This method ensures steady brand exposure over each purchase cycle for individual consumers. It also takes advantage of volume discounts in media buying. However, because continuity scheduling usually requires a large budget, it may not be practical for small advertisers. 
The flight scheduling approach alternates advertising across months, with heavy advertising in certain months and no advertising at all in other months. For example, a board game maker like Parker Brothers might concentrate its advertising in the fall when it knows that many people buy board games as gifts for the holidays. Or, with the same budget of $1,200,000, for example, a different brand could spend $200,000 per month during each of six months -- January, March, May, July, September and December -- and spend nothing during the other months, in hopes that the impact of advertising in the previous month can last into the following month. 
Pulse scheduling combines the first two scheduling methods, so that the brand maintains a low level of advertising across all months but spends more in selected months. For example, an airline like United Airlines might use a low level of continuous advertising to maintain brand awareness among business travelers. United Airlines might also have seasonal pulses to entice winter-weary consumers to fly to sunny climes. In budget allocation terms, a consumer goods brand may spend $5,000 in each of the twelve months to maintain the brand awareness and spend an additional $10,000 in January, March, May, July, September and December to attract brand switchers from competing brands. The pulse scheduling method takes advantage of both the continuity and flight scheduling methods and mitigates their weaknesses. However, this does not mean it is good for all products and services. Which method is the most appropriate for a given campaign depends on several important factors. 
How do media planners select among continuity, flight, and pulse scheduling approaches? The timing of advertising depends on three factors: seasonality, consumers' product purchase cycle, and consumers' interval between decision-making and consumption.
The first, and most important, factor is sales seasonality. Companies don't advertise fur coats in summer and suntan lotions in winter. Likewise, some products sell faster around specific holidays, such as flowers on Mother's Day, candy on Halloween, and ornaments around Christmas. Companies with seasonal products are more likely to choose flight scheduling to concentrate their advertising for the peak sales season. Other goods, however, such as everyday products like milk and toothpaste, may lack a seasonal pattern. Everyday goods may be better served by a continuity approach. Media planners can use a breakdown of sales by month to identify if their brand has seasonal fluctuations, which can serve as a guide for the allocation. They can allocate more money to high-sales months and less to low-sales months. 
The second factor that affects when advertising is scheduled is the product purchase cycle: the interval between two purchases. Fast-moving consumer goods such as bread, soft drinks and toilet paper probably require continuous weekly advertising in a competitive market to constantly reinforce brand awareness and influence frequently-made purchase decisions. In contrast, less-frequently purchased products such as carpet cleaner or floor polisher may only need advertising a few times a year. 
A third factor that affects media scheduling is the time interval between when the purchase decision is made and when a product or service is actually bought and consumed. For example, many families who take summer vacations may plan their trips months before the actual trips. That is, they make purchase decision in advance. Thus, travel industry advertisers will schedule their ads months before the summer, as we saw in the Wyoming example. Destination advertising has to be in sync with the time of decision making, instead of the actual consumption time.
New product launches usually require initial heavy advertising to create brand awareness and interest. The launch period may last from a few months to a year. As mentioned earlier, P&G launched its Gillette six-bladed Fusion shaving system with advertising on Super Bowl XL, the most expensive form of advertising in the world. If consumers like the product, then personal influence in the form of word-of-mouth or market force (brand visibility in life and media coverage) will play a role in accelerating the adoption of a new brand. Personal influence and market force are "unplanned" messages, which often play an important role in new product launches. Media planners should take advance of these "unplanned" messages in a new product launch campaign.
4. Designing Media Tactics
Establishing media objectives and developing media strategies are the primary tasks of media planners. Designing media tactics is largely carried out by media buyers. Media buyers select media vehicles to implement established media strategies. Among the major factors that affect media vehicle selection are reach and frequency considerations. 
4.1. Reach Considerations
As a major component of media objectives, the planned level of reach affects not only media mix decisions but also what media vehicles are used in each media category. High levels of reach will require a different set of media vehicles than low levels of reach. That is, high levels of reach can be better served with a mix that includes multiple media vehicles with different audiences so that cross-media duplication of audience is minimal. For example, if there are three magazines that each reach a portion of the target audience but that have few readers who read more than one magazine, advertising in these three magazines would reach the widest target audience possible because of the low overlap of the readers of the these magazines. 
What are some ways to maximize the levels of reach? One way is to analyze the audience composition of media vehicles by using syndicated media research. For example, cross-tabulations of Simmons data can be conducted to identify several magazines that reach the target audience of women aged 35 to 55, with little cross-title duplication -- few readers of one magazine also read other the magazines. These magazines can be used to implement high levels of reach in the media plan. When audience data are not available for cross-vehicle comparisons, you can select competing media vehicles in the same media category, because there is usually less duplication among the competing media vehicles. For example, most people who are interested in news may read one of the three major news weeklies: Newsweek, Time, and U.S. News and World Report; few people read all three of them. Therefore, running a print ad in all the three news magazines can reach a wide audience. 
In television, media buyers sometimes use roadblocking, which means the placement of commercials in all major television networks in the same period of time. No matter which television channel an audience member tunes in at that time, they have the opportunity to watch the commercial. The roadblocking approach has become more expensive and less effective recently because of increasing fragmentation of television audience. The term has been extended to the online world, however, where it has been very effective. To roadblock in the online world, a media planner can buy all the advertising on a Web site for a 24-hour period, such as Coke did for its launch of C2 and Ford did for its launch the F-150. Each company bought all the ad space on the front page of Yahoo for a 24-hour period. The Yahoo front page draws 25 million visitors a day. Alternatively, media planners can roadblock Yahoo, MSN, and AOL all on the same day, as Coke and Pepsi have both done. The results can produce "an astonishing, astronomical amount of reach," said Mohan Renganathan of MediaVest Worldwide, one of the biggest services for buying ad space.[31] 
4.2. Frequency Considerations
In contrast to high levels of reach, high levels of frequency can be effectively achieved through advertising in a smaller number of media vehicles to elevate audience duplications within these media vehicles. A commercial that runs three times during a 30-minute television program will result in higher message repetition than the same commercial that runs once in three different programs. 
Broadcast media are often used when high levels of frequency are desired in a relatively short period of time. Broadcast media usually enjoy a "vertical" audience, who tune in to a channel for more than one program over hours. Another phenomenon in broadcast media is audience turnover, which refers to the percentage of audience members who tune out during a program. Programs with low audience turnover are more effective for high levels of frequency. 
4.3. Media Vehicle Characteristics
With reach and frequency considerations in mind, media buyers will compare media vehicles in terms of both quantitative and qualitative characteristics. Quantitative characteristics are those that can be measured and estimated numerically, such as vehicle ratings, audience duplication with other vehicles, geographic coverage, and costs. Media buyers will choose vehicles with high ratings and less cross-vehicle audience duplication when they need high levels of reach. Media buyers also evaluate the geographic coverage of media vehicles when implementing spot advertising such as heavy advertising in certain geographic regions. Finally, media buyers pay attention to the costs of each media vehicle. When two media vehicles are similar in major aspects, media buyers choose the less expensive media vehicle. 
There are two basic calculations of media vehicle cost. The first one, cost per rating point (CPP), is used primarily for broadcast media vehicles. To derive the CPP, divide the cost of a 30-second commercial by the ratings of the vehicle in which the advertisement is placed.[SIDEBAR DEFINITION: CPP: The cost of a broadcast ad per rating point (1% of the population) provided by the media vehicle that shows the ad.] The formula for calculating CPP is as follows:
Cost Per Rating Point = Cost of the Ad / Rating of the Vehicle
For example, if the cost for a 30-second commercial ABC's "Grey's Anatomy" television program is $440,000[32] and the rating of the program is 9.7, then CPP for this buy will be $25,360.
Another media cost term is cost per thousand impressions (CPM), which is the cost to have 1000 members of the target audience exposed to an ad.[[SIDEBAR DEFINITION for CPM: Cost Per Thousand (M is the Latin abbreviation for 1000): the cost per 1000 impressions for an ad]] As you recall, the impressions are simply opportunities to see the ad. one difference between CPP and CPM is that CPM also contains the size of a vehicle audience. CPM is calculated in two steps. First, the gross impressions that an ad may get is calculated using the rating of the program and the size of the market population. Second, CPM is calculated using the cost and gross impressions. The two formulas are as follows:
Gross Impressions = Audience size * Rating / 100
CPM = Cost / Gross Impressions * 1000
Using the previous example, the rating of a television program is 10 and the cost for a 30-second commercial is $25,000. If there are 5,000,000 adults in the market, then CPM for the buy will be as follows:
            Gross Impressions = 5,000,000 * 10 / 100 = 500,000
            CPM = $25,000 / 500,000 * 1000 = $50
Thus, CPM for this media buy is $50. 
CPM can be calculated for different media, including online media. For example, an informal consensus of online media buyers agreed that a $10 CPM asking price seemed about average to pay for advertising on social-networking like Friendster, Yahoo 360 and Britain's FaceParty.[33]
In contrast to these quantitative characteristics, qualitative characteristics of media vehicles are those that are primarily judgmental, such as vehicle reputation, editorial environment, reproduction quality, and added values. For example, media vehicles vary in reputation; newspapers such as The New York Times and The Wall Street Journal generally enjoy high reputation. Furthermore, the editorial environment can be more or less favorable for advertisers. The impact of food ads, for instance, can be enhanced when they appear around articles about health or nutrition. Likewise, some magazines are better in reproduction quality than others, which enhance the impact of the ads. Finally, some media vehicles offer added values. Added values take various forms, and they benefit advertisers without additional cost. For example, a newspaper may publish a special page whose editorial context fits an advertiser's products, or a television channel may host a local event in association with a car dealership. Media buyers can work with the media to invent creative forms of added values for advertisers.
4.4. Selection of Media Vehicles
Media buyers can use tools, like the one shown below, to make the process of selecting a media vehicle easier. To use the selection tool shown in Figure 9I, develop a list of the potential vehicle candidates you are considering. Then, select several quantitative and qualitative characteristics that are relevant to reach and frequency considerations, such as quantitative characteristics like CPM or GRP, and qualitative characteristics like reputation and added value. Next, make a table that lists the vehicle candidates in rows and the characteristics in columns. Now you can rate each of the characteristics of each vehicle on a scale of 1 to 3. Then add all the numbers in each row, dividing by the total number of characteristics (columns) to arrive at the rating for each vehicle. The best media vehicles to choose are those with the highest index numbers. In Figure 8, Vehicle 2 and Vehicle 3 are the best ways to reach the target audience. 
Figure 8: Selection of Media Vehicle Based on Quantitative and Qualitative Characteristics



 
Qn1
Qn2
Qn3
Ql1
Ql2
Ql3
Index


V1
3
2
1
3
1
1
1.8


V2
1
2
2
2
2
3
2.0


V3
1
3
3
1
1
3
2.0


V4
1
1
2
1
2
1
1.3




  5. Evaluating Media Plan Effectiveness
Accountability is increasingly important in media planning, as more advertisers expect to see returns on their investments in advertising. Because media spending usually accounts for 80 percent or more of the budget for typical advertising campaigns, the effectiveness of media plans is of particular importance. As a result, media planners often make measures of the effectiveness of a media plan an integral part of the media plan. Although sales results are the ultimate measure of the effectiveness of an advertising campaign, the sales result is affected by many factors, such as price, distribution and competition, which are often out of the scope of the advertising campaign.[34] It is important, therefore, to identify what measures are most relevant to the effectiveness of media planning and buying. We will examine the topic of measurement in more detail in chapters 21 and 22, but here is an introduction to measurement that is specific to media plans.
5.1. What to Measure
Because of the hierarchical nature of the media effects, the effectiveness of media planning should be measured with multiple indictors. The first measure is the actual execution of scheduled media placements. Did the ads appear in the media vehicles in agreed-upon terms? Media buyers look at "tear-sheets" -- copies of the ads as they have appeared in print media -- for verification purposes. For electronic media, media buyers examine the ratings of the programs in which commercials were inserted to make sure the programs delivered the promised ratings. If the actual program ratings are significantly lower than what the advertiser paid for, the media usually "make good" for the difference in ratings by running additional commercials without charge. 
The most direct measure of the effectiveness of media planning is the media vehicle exposure. Media planners ask: How many of the target audience were exposed to the media vehicles and to ads in those vehicles during a given period of time? This question is related to the communication goals in the media objectives. If the measured level of exposure is near to or exceeds the planned reach and frequency, then the media plan is considered to be effective.
Several additional measures can be made of the target audience, such as:
Brand awareness -- how many of the target audience are aware of the advertised brand?
  Comprehension -- does the target audience understand the advertised brand? Is there any miscomprehension?
  Conviction -- is the target audience convinced by ads? How do they like the advertised brands?
  Action -- how many of the target audience have purchased the advertised brand as a result of the media campaign?
The measured results of brand awareness, comprehension, conviction and action are often a function of both advertising creative and media planning. Even effective media planning may not generate anticipated cognitive, affective and conative responses if the ads are poorly created and not appealing to the target audience. On the other hand, ineffective media planning may be disguised when the ads are highly creative and brilliant. Thus, these measures should be reviewed by both creative directors and media planners to make accurate assessments of the effectiveness of the media plan.
5.2. How to Measure
The measurement of the effectiveness of a media plan can be conducted by the advertising agency or by independent research services, using methods such as surveys, feedback, tracking, and observation. Each method has its strengths and weaknesses. For example, surveys can be conducted among a sampling of the target audience in the different periods of a media campaign, such as in the beginning, the middle and the end of the campaign. Surveys can ask questions about the target audience's media behavior, advertising recall, brand attitudes and actual purchase. Radiowatch, for instance, conducts monthly surveys on advertising recall of radio commercials in England. Radiowatch surveys 1000 adults age 16-64 and asks them which radio commercials they remember hearing. In the April 2006 survey, the most-recalled ad was for T-Mobile, with 46% of respondents recalling the ad. An ad for McDonald's had 36% recall, while the ad for Peugeot received 18%. 
Besides surveys, feedback can be collected to measure the media and ad exposure of the target audience. Feedback devices such as reply cards, toll-free numbers, coupons and Web addresses can be provided in ads so that tallies of the responses or redemptions can be made to estimate the impact of advertising media. Advertisers often use a different code in direct response ads to identify different media vehicles. For example, in the April 3 2006 issue of BusinessWeek, the reply card for subscribing to the magazine had a code of JS6D1, whereas the reply card bound into the May 29, 2006 issue of the magazine had a code of JS6E2. Similarly, when the Garden of Eatin' gives coupons for its tortilla chips, the UPC code on the coupon indicates which media vehicle the coupon was in, such as whether the coupon came from the 2006 Bolder Boulder promotional calendar or from the Organic and Natural Experience (ONE) 2006 Tour book of coupons. In short, by reviewing the different codes recorded, media buyers can assess the response rate of each media vehicle. 
As you can see from the Radiowatch and Garden of Eatin' examples, one advantage of surveys over feedback devices is that surveys reach people who have taken no action on the product, whereas feedback devices require the consumer to mail back, click or call a toll-free number. In this way, surveys can help media buyers evaluate the effectiveness of an ad in relation to other ads, whereas feedback devices help them evaluate the effectiveness of one media vehicle over another. 
Tracking is measurement method that media buyers use to track the effectiveness of online ads. When a user visits a Web site or clicks on a banner ad, Web servers automatically log that action in real time. The logs of these visits and actions are very useful for media buyers, because the buyers can use them to estimate the actual interaction of audience members with the interactive media. For example, a banner ad may have a code for each Web site where the ad is placed. Media buyers can compare the click-through rates of the banner ad across all Web sites daily, to estimate the effectiveness of each Web site. Media buyers are making more use of the tracking method given the increasing use of interactive media. 
Finally, in the physical world, media buyers can use observation to collect audience reaction information at the points of purchase or during marketing events. For example, researchers can be stationed in grocery stores to observe how consumers react to in-store advertising or how they select an advertised brand in comparison of other brands. The advantage of observation is that it provides rich, detailed data on how consumers behave in real situations in response to the marketing communication. The downside is that direct observation is more costly to conduct and tabulate.
This article described the media planning process, starting from establishing media objectives through to developing media strategies and tactics and finally evaluating the effectiveness of the media plan. You've learned how to identify your target audience; evaluate different media vehicles on the basis of reach, frequency and GRPs; make prudent media mix decisions using tools like BDI and CDI and scheduling concepts like continuity, flight and pulse scheduling; make sound budget decisions using tools like CPP and CPM; and, finally, evaluate the effectiveness of your media plan through surveys, feedback devices, tracking and observation. In the next four chapters, we'll delve more deeply into the different types of media ?print media, broadcast media, out-of-home media and interactive media ?to help you understand the ad formats, strengths/weakness and cost structures of each of these advertising media.
References
[1] Veronis Suhler Stevenson (2005), "Communications Industry Forecast 2005-2009," New York.
[2] Susan Spillman (1985), "Marketers Race to Leave Their Brand on Films," Advertising Age, July 1, 56 (51): 3-4  and http://www.itvx.com/SpecialReport.asp as retrieved on May 5, 2006
[3] http://www.subservientchicken.com/
[4] Wilcha, Kristin. (2005) "Winning Ways," Shoot June 10, p15(3)
 [5] Creamer, Matthew (2006), "Disclosure doesn't Hamper Word of Mouth Marketing," Advertising Age, January 19, http://www.adage.com/news.cms?newsId=47532.
[6] Wasserman, Todd (2006) "Word Games," Brandweek, April 24, 2006 p24(4)
 [7] Daniel Gross (2005), "The Scramble on Mad. Ave.," Fortune, August 8, 63-64.
[8] Cliff Peale (2006),  "P&G Angles for Fusion Razor," The Cincinnati Enquirer, February 8, 2006.
 [9] William C. Symonds ( 2005) "Gillette's Five-Blade Wonder," BusinessWeek, September 15, 2005.
[10] Jack Neff (2005), "Gillette to launch Fusion Shaver with Super Bowl Ad," Advertising Age, December 21 (http://www.adage.com/news.cms?newsId=47247)
[11] Justin Rubner (2006) "Telecom giants square off in ad spat," Atlanta Business Chronicle, May 19, 2006
[12] Solman, Gregory (2005). "Mazda Is Fine-tuning Media Mix With Less TV."   ADWEEK Western Edition, December 21, 2005
 [13] http://www.sric-bi.com/VALS/innovators.shtml
[14] Yuichi Washida (2005), "Collaborative Structure between Japanese High-tech Manufacturers and Consumers," Journal of Consumer Marketing, 22(1), 25-34.
 [15] http://www.smrb.com/
[16] http://www.mediamark.com/
 [17] http://www.census.gov/
[18] Bill Harvey (1997), "The Expanded ARF Model: Bridge to the Advertising Accountability Future," Journal of Advertising Research, March/April: 11-20.
 [19] Avery M. Abernethy (1990), "Television Exposure: Programs vs. Advertising," Current Issues and Research in Advertising, 13, 61-78.

[20] Reynolds, Mike (2006) "Nick bullish on kids' market." Multichannel News, March 13, 2006 p25. 
[21] Jack Z. Sissors and Roger B. Baron (2002), "Advertising Media Planning," Sixth Edition, McGraw-Hill.
[22] Michael J. Naples (1979), "Effective Frequency: The relationship between Frequency and Advertising Awareness," Association of National Advertisers, New York.
 [23] John P. Jones (1995a), When Ads Work: New Proof that Advertising Triggers Sales. New York: Lexington Books.
[24] Erwin Ephron (1997), "Recency Planning," Journal of Advertising Research, 37(4), 61-65.
 [25] Joseph W. Ostrow (1984), "Setting Frequency Levels: An Art or a Science?" Journal of Advertising Research, 24(4), I-9 to I-11.
[26] "Biggest brands: Top 10 by category." Marketing, August 24, 2005
 [27]  "Go Daddy's Super Bowl Ad Receives Unprecedented Publicity." (2005) PR Newswire, March 3, 2005.
[28] George Raine (2005), "The Super Bowl: Malfunction Junction / Fox Scrambles to Explain Why It Pulled Racy TV Ad," San Francisco Chronicle (Feb 9):A1. 
[29] "Go Daddy's Super Bowl Ad Receives Unprecedented Publicity." (2005) PR Newswire, March 3, 2005.
[30] TravelScope Profile of U.S. Travelers to Louisiana (2002) prepared by The Research Department of the Travel Industry Association of America, Washington, D.C., August 2002. http://www.latour.lsu.edu/
 [31] Alan Deutschman (2005) "Commercial Success," Fast Company, January 2005 p74. http://www.fastcompany.com/magazine/90/commercial-success.html
[32] Steve McClellan (2005) "Fox Breaks Prime-Time Pricing Record," Adweek, September 12, 2005 http://www.adweek.com/aw/search/article_display.jsp?vnu_content_id=1001096022
[33] Snyder Bulik, Beth. (2006)  "How to make the connection." Advertising Age, May 1, 2006 p85
[34] Solomon Dutka (1995), Defining Advertising Goals for Measured Advertising Results," second edition, NTC Business Books. 

© 2007 All Rights Reserved


 



                            PlayAd Media Group AB
                    
























Playad Media Group






































A complete solution for online video in the nordic region































Premium pays

            We believe that premium pays and that is our basic thinking in everything we do and offer. Through our Nordic premium online video network, proprietary technology, a wide product range of cross-screen ad formats, a syndicated web TV platform (YouPlay), a research department and a digital studio that creates engaging ad experiences, we provide advertisers across the Nordics with a complete solution for online video.

          Our first online video ad was launced in Sweden februari 2009. Today PlayAd
          Media Group is the leading provider of online video in Nordic region (Sweden, Norway, Denmark and Finland).


Learn more about PlayAd Media Group >







              Trough our own technology company adTEN we empowers digital publishers, advertising networks and media agencies to get the most out of online advertising and online video cross screen.

Learn more >






Scandinavia’s largest independent premium network >















            We provide publishers and content providers with a complete syndicated Web TV platform. The result is Scandinavia’s largest ad founded Web TV channel with free premium syndicated content.
          
Learn more about YouPlay >







Digital Production
PlayAd Studios collaborates with advertisers and agencies across the Nordics to create amazing interactive and engaging ad experiences in PlayAds Engage formats.
          
Visit Playad Studios >






Development of online video is probably the most important process in media today. Learn more from our research >








Our product range of cross screen ad formats >









Sweden

Grev Turegatan 27, 114 38 Stockholm
            




Norway

Bygdøy Alle 10, 0262 Oslo
            




Denmark

Studiestræde 14A, 1th. 1455 København K.
            




Finland

Korkeavuorenkatu 1 B 11, 00140 Helsinki
            





















Home | Yahoo Advertising














 
 

















    ⌂HomeMailSearchNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityWeatherAnswersFlickrMobileMore⋁PoliticsMoviesMusicTVGroupsStyleBeautyTechShoppingInstall the new Firefox »   Yahoo                       👤 Sign in    ✉ Mail     ⚙ Help    Account Info Help         


















PREMIUM ADVERTISING

AOL and Yahoo are now Oath







PROGRAMMATIC ADVERTISING

How will "Fake News" affect online ad budgets?






NATIVE ADVERTISING

Overcoming challenges with mobile attribution






PROGRAMMATIC ADVERTISING

Finding the right technology partners to protect your brand






MOBILE ADVERTISING

The overlooked influence of Gen X






 


POPULAR




Build successful native video campaigns




The overlooked influence of Gen X




Search retargeting comes to Yahoo Gemini on native supply








CURRENT







PREMIUM ADVERTISING
Videos

AOL and Yahoo are now Oath








PROGRAMMATIC ADVERTISING
Blog posts

What advertisers want publishers to know about video








NATIVE ADVERTISING
Blog posts

How publishers can monetize while reaching millennial audiences








MOBILE ADVERTISING
Blog posts

What financial marketers should know about credit card intenders








PREMIUM ADVERTISING
Case studies

Pizza Hut wins with new campaigns reaching sports fans on Yahoo







 
 

































AOL Platforms











The Advertising.com website is now part of ONE by AOL.
    Need to know more? Contact AOL Platforms.
Advertisers Publishers



















GroupM | Number One global media investment management group
























 Toggle navigation    
  





Search form
Search


































ABOUT GROUPM


WHAT WE DO


OUR TECHNOLOGY


GLOBAL LEADERSHIP













About GroupM GroupM is the number one global media investment management group. We offer the intelligence to find or create valuable audiences, the power to engage them most effectively and efficiently, and the ability to create desired marketing outcomes.

GroupM is the number one global media investment management group. We offer the intelligence to find or create valuable audiences, the power to engage them most effectively and efficiently, and the ability to create desired marketing outcomes.











What we do 

“Our investments in data, technology and most importantly, our talented people, help our clients win in an intensely competitive marketplace.”
Kelly Clark CEO, GroupM Global



GroupM invests in people, content, technology and data to make its agencies optimally effective and efficient for clients, providing intelligence to find or create valuable audiences and outcomes. Our leadership, inventiveness and scale drive success for our clients, partners and people.











Strategy & Business Development



“We help brands reach their consumers with the right messages on their path to purchase, at the right time and in the right context.”
Elizabeth McCune



GroupM’s approach is based on one powerful principle: a winning strategy begins with precise consumer insight and impeccable business science. In this, we are unrivaled. Proprietary technology drives our business science capabilities and insights, fueling our ongoing growth and position as the largest media investment management organization in the world. Our scale powers our agencies’ efficiency, paired with the inventiveness of our people, we are able to create unique and lucrative marketing opportunities for clients.
GroupM agencies understand that people and conversations are just as important as TRPs, GRPs, and CPMs. They appreciate how ideas and context influence perception and behavior. Each agency provides clients a custom strategic plan reflecting their unique view of the world. Agency diversity in GroupM’s portfolio means there’s a perfect fit for every client -- no matter their size, their industry or business goals.


Elizabeth McCune
Head of Marketing, Communications & Business Development, GroupM Global
Elizabeth.McCune@GroupM.com




Trading



“Our unique talent, media partnerships and scale enable us to deliver investment efficiencies giving clients competitive advantage.”
Johan Boserup



GroupM is the central trading organization for WPP's media agencies and also the world's largest buyer of media with 2014 billings of more than $106 billion (RECMA, 2014). One of every three ads placed worldwide utilize ad inventory purchased by GroupM. Our peerless global understanding of media marketplaces and trading provide real incremental value and marketing advantages that benefit clients every day. We offer complete transparency and always respect clients’ confidential trading interests.


Johan Boserup
CEO Trading, GroupM Global
Johan.Boserup@GroupM.com




[m]PLATFORM



“Companies and brands are under pressure to meet unprecedented consumer expectations for personalization and to deliver stakeholder demands for results. As the pressure on marketing intensifies, our agencies deliver a new level of communications addressability and relevance to help brands create consumer engagement that is measurable and accountable. [m]PLATFORM is how we do that.”

Brian Gleason


[m]PLATFORM is GroupM’s audience intelligence and activation solution that builds personalized consumer relationships at scale. In addition to the technology suite, it is a worldwide service organization comprised of analysts, data strategists, search and social specialists, and product and media experts focused on ensuring consistent delivery in all markets where our clients do business. It is the foundation of your marketing advantage.


Brian Gleason
Global CEO, [m]PLATFORM
Brian.Gleason@groupm.com




Brand Safety



"We take Brand Safety very seriously. We are implementing global standards for all of the digital risk areas like, Viewability, Fraud, Privacy infringement, Anti-Piracy, Appropriate placement. As clients move more of their investment from linear channels to digital, they need to be assured that their brand messaging is seen by real humans, in the right target audience and in an appropriate environment."
John Montgomery



As new opportunities with data and measurability emerge in the digital supply chain, so do complexities. These complexities open the door for inevitable risks—including, but not limited to, fraud, piracy, viewability, privacy infringement and appropriate targeting and placement. As clients are moving more funds from linear to digital media, they are increasingly concerned that their brands are safe, and being shown to the right people, in the right place, at the right time. GroupM takes a leadership role in the navigation of these complex digital environments, creating and collaborating on stringent standards and best practices so clients can be assured that their campaigns are being viewed in brand safe environments, and that the consumer experience can be both protected and enjoyable.


John Montgomery
EVP of Brand Safety, GroupM Global
John.Montgomery@groupm.com




Content



“We invest and partner with the world’s leading talent, producers and distributors to fund, develop, produce and distribute premium content for the benefit of our content partners and networks, platforms and advertisers.”
Richard Foster



Motion Content Group is a global content investment and rights management company which creates, finances, produces, distributes and commercializes content through innovative commercial structures in partnership with talent, producers, distributors, networks, platforms and advertisers.
Headquartered in London and Los Angeles, the business currently operates in 26 countries worldwide, with Motion’s broad range of award-winning programming distributed globally.


Richard Foster
CEO, Motion Content Group
richard.foster@motioncontentgroup.com














Our Technology 

“To create advantage you must know more about your consumers than your competitors or your media partners. And, you have to be able to put this knowledge to work with your media investment. Our tech stack and data investment enables this knowledge asymmetry for our clients.”
Irwin Gotlieb Chairman, GroupM Global



At the core of [m]PLATFORM is the uniquely powerful consumer identifier, [mp]ID. This ID unifies data to provide the most comprehensive and detailed picture of an individual consumer. This offers brands a rich and holistic view into their consumers’ mindsets and a deep understanding of the impact of their marketing touchpoints. Marketers can now anticipate where consumers are likely to engage and tailor their strategy to ensure they reach the right consumers with a message that is relevant and useful.











Global Leadership 

“Our people have vision for today's marketplace and how it's going to evolve tomorrow. Our team is helping shape the media industry for the future.”
Tim Cecere Chief Talent Officer, GroupM Global



GroupM’s teams across the globe are among the most admired in media and advertising, providing the opportunity to clients, partners and our people to learn and grow with innovators and thought leaders.













read bio

Irwin Gotlieb
Chairman, GroupM Global

Linkedin





X







Irwin Gotlieb
Chairman, GroupM Global


Linkedin



                                                                            In 2012, Irwin Gotlieb was named Chairman of GroupM. Irwin joined WPP in September 1999 as Chairman and CEO of Mindshare Worldwide and moved into his previous role as CEO of GroupM in April 2003. Prior to WPP he was President and CEO of MediaVest Worldwide, a company that he founded in December 1993. The founding of MediaVest represented the fulfillment of a 22 year journey with the company which started with his joining Benton & Bowles in 1977 as Associate Director of Broadcast Programming.Irwin is a three time Adweek/Mediaweek All Star, including a President's Award in 1997. He is also a double Advertising Age Media Maven honoree and in February 2000 was named as the Media Player of the Year by Advertising Age - the only occasion that this award has been given. In October 2006, he became the first advertising / media agency executive to be inducted into the Broadcast & Cable Hall of Fame. In January 2010, he received the Brandon Tartikoff Legacy Award, and most recently has been named to the Inaugural Adweek’s Power List.
                                                                        










read bio

Kelly Clark 
CEO, GroupM Global 

Linkedin





X







Kelly Clark 
CEO, GroupM Global 


Linkedin



                                                                            Kelly Clark is the Chief Executive Officer of GroupM, a role he assumed in September 2016. Kelly is a truly global executive with strong operational and client management experience across Europe, Asia Pacific and North America.  He has worked closely with some of the world’s leading marketers including NBCUniversal, Target, Unilever, Nike, IBM, Nestle, Kellogg, GSK, Ford Motor Company and L'Oréal.  He has held multiple leadership roles within GroupM and its agencies during his career. Most recently he was CEO of GroupM North America, responsible for all of GroupM’s business activities in the US and Canada, overseeing $30 billion in client billings and 5,500 employees. From 2008 – 2011, Kelly was the worldwide CEO of Maxus, one of five global media agency networks in GroupM.  During his tenure, Maxus was the fastest growing global media agency for four consecutive years according to RECMA.Before leading Maxus, Kelly was CEO of GroupM’s operations in Europe, the Middle East and Africa (EMEA) , responsible for $26 billion in client billings and a team of 6,000. Earlier in his career, he was CEO of Mindshare UK and before that Mindshare Asia Pacific.Kelly has lived and worked in New York, London, Tokyo and Hong Kong during his time with GroupM.  He is a graduate of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.  He lives in New York City with his wife and three children.
                                                                        










read bio

Nick Emery
Global CEO, Mindshare






X







Nick Emery
Global CEO, Mindshare





                                                                            Nick co-founded Mindshare in 1997. He has been working in the global media arena for 25 years. Nick's history is as a planner, but he has worked across markets and in all aspects of the media business. Mindshare replaced playing in bands with strange names and has remained his obsession. Mindshare, marriage, two children and a dog is all he has time for.
                                                                        










read bio

Tim Castree
Global CEO, MEC

Linkedin





X







Tim Castree
Global CEO, MEC


Linkedin



                                                                            In his role as Chief Executive Officer, Tim leads one of the world's largest media agency networks, overseeing more than 6,000 people in 90 countries. In 2016, MEC won significant new business, including BMW and Nationwide in the UK, Hertz in North and Latin America and Vodafone in Australia; and retained Beiersdorf and SAB Miller in EMEA.  The agency also picked up 4 Campaign Asia Media Agency of the year metals in Hong Kong, Taiwan, Indonesia and Vietnam and won numerous awards for its Talent Management leadership initiatives.With over 20 years of industry experience, Tim’s diverse management experience spans creative, media and integrated agencies.Prior to joining MEC, Tim was Managing Director for Videology’s USA business where he developed the company’s strategy for providing cross-screen media technology solutions for advertisers, agencies and media companies. Previously, Tim was Chief Operating Officer for MediaVest US, running the business and leading major client accounts including American Honda Motor Company, Mondelēz, Coca-Cola, Microsoft and Sprint.  He was also President, Global Managing Director for SMG, leading the global P&G business, spanning 160 assignments in 70 countries. Earlier in his career at SMG, Tim oversaw other clients such as Mars Wrigley, Wendy’s and Heineken. Tim began his career at Leo Burnett in Melbourne. He was the head of client management at BBH New York, before spending three years back in Australia as the CEO for Leo Burnett in Sydney, where under his leadership Leo Burnett was named Australia’s Agency of the Year.
                                                                        












read bio

Stephen Allan
Global CEO, MediaCom

Linkedin





X







Stephen Allan
Global CEO, MediaCom


Linkedin



                                                                            Stephen Allan was appointed MediaCom's Worldwide Chairman and CEO in August 2008. Stephen's global objectives for MediaCom are clear – to become the world's largest media agency by 2012, and also the best agency to work for in every country. The first, he believes, will be achieved via the latter, and accordingly his first six months as global chairman and CEO saw the launch of numerous new unique global initiatives to support his plans and MediaCom's philosophy People First>>Better Results.Stephen re-joins MediaCom from the role of CEO for GroupM UK, which he moved to in 2005 following six successful years as CEO of MediaCom UK. During his five years of leadership, MediaCom quadrupled its billings, rising from a sixth placed ranking to become the UK's number one media agency, voted Media Agency of Year and one of the UK's Best 100 Companies To Work For.Other career achievements include being the youngest leader of a publicly listed company (the Media Business Group in 1995), and overseeing the undoubtedly most successful merger in the recent UK advertising history (TMBG and MediaCom in 1999).Stephen is married, with one son. He also founded and co-chairs a children's charity, Rays of Sunshine.
                                                                        










read bio

Lindsay Pattison
Global Chief Transformation Officer, GroupM and Worldwide CEO, Maxus Global

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Lindsay Pattison
Global Chief Transformation Officer, GroupM and Worldwide CEO, Maxus Global


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            In May 2017, Lindsay was named Global Chief Transformation Officer for GroupM. The newly created position sees Lindsay lead change initiatives across GroupM, its media agencies and specialists, and working closely with leaders across WPP to deliver the best possible communications for clients.  Lindsay will also continue to serve as Global CEO of Maxus, a position held since October 2014. She joined Maxus in October 2009 as UK CEO and in August 2012, Lindsay took on an additional role as Global Chief Strategy Officer for Maxus. Prior to Maxus, Lindsay worked at PHD and client-side at Sony Ericsson, after starting out at Young & Rubicam in a full service agency environment. Lindsay now sits on the Chime LTD board as a non-executive director, representing WPP. She served two terms on the WEF Global Agenda Council on the Future of Media and was named one of Cranfield’s FTSE Board Report’s 100 Women to Watch in 2015 and 2016. Lindsay was also named to Ad Age’s 2015 class of Women to Watch. As a passionate and vocal campaigner for gender equality, she launched ‘Walk the Talk’, an initiative to help senior women at Maxus to thrive and progress in their career – a program now adopted globally by WPP. 
                                                                        










read bio

Christian Juhl
Global CEO, Essence 

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Christian Juhl
Global CEO, Essence 


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            Christian Juhl is Global CEO at Essence, a digitally-born media agency that blends data science, objective media, and captivating experiences to build valuable connections between brands and consumers. Clients include Google, Hewlett-Packard, Viber, Intuit, method, Tesco Mobile, Visa, GrubHub, and the Financial Times. The agency is more than 600 people strong, has offices in London, New York, San Francisco, Seattle, Singapore, and Tokyo, manages over $800MM in media spend, and deploys campaigns in 71 markets.In his role as Global CEO, Christian is responsible for driving the agency's growth in creation, innovation, and digital transformation with Essence's clients and people. He originally joined the agency in October of 2013 to lead North American operations, and was made Global CEO in spring of 2014. Christian came to the agency from Razorfish, where he held a number of ascending titles, including SVP Managing Director, VP Client Director, and Director of Business Development, culminating in the position of President of Razorfish's West region, a role he held for over four years. 
                                                                        










read bio

Jess Burley
Global CEO, m/SIX

Linkedin





X







Jess Burley
Global CEO, m/SIX


Linkedin



                                                                            Jess has been Global Chief Executive of m/SIX since 2010 – heading up the agency’s media planning and buying operations across 30 offices spanning the UK, Europe, US, South America and Asia. In her time at m/SIX, she has helped establish the business as one of the UK’s fastest-growing media planning and buying agencies, with deep expert knowledge in digital planning, programmatic and data analytics – using data-driven audience insights to inform campaign planning from creative through to media strategy. She has helped m/SIX become a leader in brand safety and transparency, delivering record viewability standards for clients internationally, including TalkTalk, JUST EAT, Virgin Money and Bank of New York Mellon.As a senior partner in WPP-backed agency group The&Partnership, Jess also heads up data and technology projects for all clients across The&Partnership globally, as well as holding the role of Chairman for the group’s content and digital engagement agency AllTogetherNow.Jess has specialist knowledge in retail, telecoms, FMCG, financial services and publishing, having begun her career with the Financial Times, Future Publishing, Gruner and Jahr and Natmags. At Natmags (now Hearst), Jess was responsible for delivering exceptional growth and savings, progressing swiftly to become Chief Operating Officer and then Group MD. As MD, she helped restructure the business, merging Hearst Digital with the core Natmags business and launching all the business’s magazine sites into one digital network.As well as her executive roles in media, Jess also sits on the boards of UK Mail Plc and Quarto Publishing, and is a Trustee for young people’s charity The Mix, which is part of The Royal Foundation’s Heads Together partnership. Jess studied English Literature and Theatre Arts at University, and trained as a ballet dancer – thinking she would pursue ballet professionally until the age of 19. She lives in London with her husband Mark, and is passionate about golf, literature and music as well as media.
                                                                        












read bio

Rob Norman
Global Chief Digital Officer & Chairman North America

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Rob Norman
Global Chief Digital Officer & Chairman North America


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            As Chief Digital Officer of GroupM Global, Rob oversees the activities of the world’s largest buyer of online. In this role, he develops the digital capabilities within GroupM while establishing thought leadership positioning in the digital space and contributing to each agency’s business development.Prior to taking this role in 2012, Rob served as CEO of GroupM North America where he was responsible for the general management as well as strategic and administrative activities at each of GroupM’s four media agencies. From 2007 – 2010 Rob served as head of Group M Interaction, which included the digital offerings of each GroupM agency as well as the integrated global search organization.Rob was named a Media Maven by Advertising Age in 2007. He sits on the advisory board of WPP Digital, the venture arm of GroupM parent company WPP, and is a member of the Board of Governors of the Center for the Digital Future at the University of Southern California’s Annenberg School for Communication. He also is on the board of the 4A’s, and the Ad Council and leads GroupM’s diversity efforts, including a scholarship program at City College New York.Rob has worked for more than two decades in the media agency business in a wide range of increasingly senior roles, mostly at MEC, where he was named U.K. Chairman in 2003. He joined the company in 1986 prior to the merger, when the agency was known as CIA. Rob rose quickly through the ranks at CIA, first becoming a Group Head and then founding the company’s first joint venture media operation, which became the model for three subsequent ventures. In 2002, following the merger of CIA with Mediaedge, Rob was appointed Worldwide Director of New Business Development.Rob lives in New York and is widely believed to be the only Englishman with a working knowledge of baseball’s infield fly rule. He is a fan of the New York Mets, the New York Jets, Tottenham Hotspur and Warren Buffett.
                                                                        










read bio

Colin Barlow
Chief Operating Officer, GroupM Global

Linkedin





X







Colin Barlow
Chief Operating Officer, GroupM Global


Linkedin



                                                                            In August 2014, Colin Barlow was promoted to the role of Global Chief Operating Officer for GroupM. In this new role he leads financial oversight, acquisitions, corporate partnerships, operational efficiencies of tools, systems and processes and also contributes the oversight of the trading operations.Prior to assuming his current position, Colin served as GroupM’s Chief Financial Officer beginning in 2007, overseeing all financial and information technology management activities for GroupM Global operating agencies which extend across more than 25,000 employees and operations in 70 countries.Colin previously served as CFO of GroupM EMEA. Before moving to GroupM, he worked for Razorfish, Ogilvy, Arthur Andersen, following graduating in Electronic Engineering in the UK.
                                                                        










read bio

Stuart Diamond
Chief Financial Officer, GroupM Global

Linkedin





X







Stuart Diamond
Chief Financial Officer, GroupM Global


Linkedin



                                                                            Stuart Diamond is GroupM’s Global Chief Financial Officer. In this role he is responsible for all financial management activities for GroupM worldwide and its operating companies; which include Maxus, MEC, MediaCom, Mindshare, Xaxis and Essence.Stuart Diamond served as the CFO for GroupM North America from 2008 until 2014. Stuart was responsible for establishing financial strategies for the region as well as overseeing all corporate accounting and financial activities for GroupM and its agencies. In his position he handled budgets, forecasts and takes an active leadership role in GroupM acquisitions.Before joining GroupM, Stuart was CFO for NMHC for two years (2006-2008), a comprehensive pharmacy benefit management company that serves approximately five million members, he oversaw systems and controls of internal accounting to ensure the quality and reliability of NMHC’s financial systems and reporting.Prior to NMHC he was a member of the WPP family as the CFO for Healthworld Corporation taking them (now called Ogilvy Healthworld) public and negotiating their sale to Cordiant Communications in 2000. During his tenure at Healthworld, he completed IPO and the acquisitions of companies in the United States, United Kingdom, France, Italy, Canada, Finland and Spain.Stuart has a BS in Accounting from State University of New York at Buffalo, MBA in Finance from Fordham University and a Masters of Science in Taxation from Pace University, and is also a Certified Public Accountant.  
                                                                        










read bio

Elizabeth McCune
Head of Marketing, Communications & Business Development, GroupM Global

Linkedin





X







Elizabeth McCune
Head of Marketing, Communications & Business Development, GroupM Global


Linkedin



                                                                            Elizabeth is Head of the Global Marketing, Communications and Business Development team. In this role, she is responsible for global oversight of the GroupM brand, as an entity and the sum of its operating companies. She also oversees major business development and revenue growth across GroupM.Elizabeth has worked across many global brands in both strategy and client leadership positions, including Toyota, Exxon Mobil and GE. More recently her leadership was instrumental in some of the largest new business wins, including NBC Universal, Nestle and IKEA and in the global repositioning of the GroupM brand.Prior to working for GroupM, Elizabeth held senior-level positions at Omnicom Media Group and Ogilvy. Elizabeth holds an MBA from the University of Georgia’s Terry School of Business and a bachelor's degree from The College of Charleston. And, she is a member of the New York Junior League, spending time with grammar school children weekly through the League’s Cultural Enrichment of the Youth program. 
                                                                        












read bio

Brian Lesser
CEO, GroupM North America

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Brian Lesser
CEO, GroupM North America


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            Brian Lesser is CEO of GroupM in North America where he is responsible for overseeing strategy and operations for the world’s largest media investment management organization. With an emphasis on the smart application of data and technology, Brian is charged with maximizing the value of media investments for many of the world’s largest advertisers. He does this through the development and support of GroupM’s leading agencies and specialist companies including Mindshare, MEC, MediaCom, Maxus, Essence and Xaxis.Prior to this role, Brian was global CEO of Xaxis, a company he founded in 2011 and led to over a billion dollars in revenue. Under his leadership, Xaxis became the global pacesetter for the programmatic advertising industry, pioneering numerous technology firsts and expanding via several acquisitions and investments in the burgeoning ad tech space. At Xaxis, Brian oversaw the development of over 40 new offices, bringing programmatic advertising to major markets including China and Latin America.Earlier, Brian was SVP and General Manager of WPP’s Media Innovation Group, where he launched the first data management platform for agencies and was instrumental in creating the first and largest agency trading desk. Prior, Brian was VP of product management at 24/7 Media, a global media and technology firm acquired by WPP in 2007.Brian has been recognized for his foundational role in the ad industry’s shift to a more data and technology-driven model. In 2016 he was named to the Crain 100, a list of the top disrupters and change-makers in business. In 2015 he was cited as one of “Five Advertising Executives to Watch” by the Wall Street Journal and in 2014 he was named to Ad Age’s 40 Under 40 list. Brian has a BA from the University of Pennsylvania and an MBA from Columbia Business School. He is a director and advisor to emerging advertising technology companies. Brian lives in New Jersey with his wife and three children.
                                                                        










read bio

Mark Patterson
CEO, GroupM APAC & Chairman, GroupM China

Linkedin





X







Mark Patterson
CEO, GroupM APAC & Chairman, GroupM China


Linkedin



                                                                            Mark Patterson is the CEO, GroupM APAC and Chairman, GroupM China. A graduate in commerce from Birmingham University, Mark began his media career in London as a marketing and then sales executive with a leading billboard contractor (now Clear Channel).In late 1988 he joined Ogilvy & Mather London as a media planner and progressed over the next several years to the position of Media Group Director.In October 2000 Mark moved to Tokyo to take on the role of CEO of Mindshare Japan and worked with the team there in establishing Mindshare as the first major media agency in Japan focusing on media planningIn 2002 Mark's role extended to CEO North Asia and in mid 2003 he relocated to Hong Kong managing China, Taiwan, Hong Kong, Japan and Korea.In October 2005 Mark was appointed as CEO GroupM North Asia with responsibility for all WPP's media assets in the sub-region including Maxus, MEC, MediaCom, Mindshare and Kinetic with combined billings of US$3bn (RECMA).In May 2007, Mark was appointed as COO, GroupM Asia Pacific and in June 2008, Mark was appointed as CEO, GroupM Asia Pacific.
                                                                        










read bio

Dominic Grainger
CEO, GroupM EMEA

Linkedin





X







Dominic Grainger
CEO, GroupM EMEA


Linkedin



                                                                            Dominic started his career at Price Waterhouse in 1987 where he advised a number of FTSE 100 companies and multinationals specializing in mergers and acquisitions across Europe. His advertising-related clients included CIA Group (later Tempus Group PLC) as it started to expand by acquisition across Europe from 1993 onwards.His media career started in 1997 when he joined CIA as Chief Financial Officer of CIA Europe and was heavily involved in building and then consolidating the European network. Dominic became Chief Operating Officer when the CIA regions were aligned to create CIA Worldwide in 2001.In late 2001, Tempus was acquired by WPP. Following the merger of CIA with The Media Edge in 2002.Dominic was appointed Chief Executive Officer of MEC Europe, Middle East and Africa. In the following three years Mediaedge:cia EMEA saw significant growth and developed its offer into one of the region's leading communications planning and implementation agencies with 120 offices in 46 countries.Dominic became Managing Director of GroupM Europe, Middle East and Africa in January 2006 and was promoted to Chief Executive Officer in October 2008.
                                                                        










read bio

José María Sanabria
CEO, GroupM LATAM

Linkedin





X







José María Sanabria
CEO, GroupM LATAM


Linkedin



                                                                            José María Sanabria is CEO for GroupM Latin America, a role he was appointed to in 2015.  For five years prior, he was CEO of GroupM Spain where he led the development of the business to new heights of success.  Previously, José María worked in Havas Media for more than ten years where he held various increasingly responsible positions: first as Director of Information Technology, then as General Manager at Media Planning Madrid and later as General Manager of MPG Iberia. Before entering the advertising business, José María developed a career in information technology, a discipline that is now an essential core-competency for modern media investment management.  José María worked both in a hardware manufacturer (NCR) and later in software house, developing business applications for the Public Administration in Spain. José María’s experience includes several management, strategic marketing and executive development programs including programs at The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania, Stanford University, and Insead. He has served on the Board of “Autocontrol de la Publicidad” (Advertising Self-Regulation Association in Spain), the Executive Committees of the Media Agencies’ Association in Spain,  the Control Board of Kantar Media (TV audiometry), and also as a member of the Spanish Juries Club of the Effectiveness Awards.  José María is an Aeronautical Engineer.
                                                                        












read bio

Manjiry Tamhane
Global CEO, Gain Theory 

Linkedin





X







Manjiry Tamhane
Global CEO, Gain Theory 


Linkedin



                                                                            With over 20 years’ experience in the marketing effectiveness industry, Manjiry has been integral to Gain Theory’s success since its inception and is now Global CEO. In her global role she enshrines the consultancy’s vision and strategy alongside leading global client relationships. Throughout her career - client side (Penhaligons and Debenhams) and agency (Ohal and Gain Theory) - Manjiry’ s guiding principle has been to deliver actionable recommendations that maximize the benefit of marketing investment. To this effect, connecting data, insights and outcomes against KPIs via a high touch consultative approach is of paramount importance to her and has contributed to Gain Theory’s high client retention rate. Manjiry holds a bachelor’s degree from the London School of Economics and an MSc from the University of Warwick. As an accomplished author and speaker, Manjiry has been an advocate in the industry for the importance of balancing magic and logic as well as the challenge and opportunities resulting from the Internet of Things. Manjiry is a member of the Marketing Society and a juror on the Creative Data panel at Cannes Lions, 2016. 
                                                                        










read bio

Brian Gleason
Global CEO, [m]PLATFORM

Linkedin





X







Brian Gleason
Global CEO, [m]PLATFORM


Linkedin



   Brian Gleason is Global Chief Executive Officer of GroupM’s [m]PLATFORM. [m]PLATFORM is GroupM’s audience intelligence and activation solution, building personalized consumer relationships at scale. Brian leads a multi-disciplinary team of nearly 5,000 analysts, data strategists, search and social specialists, and product and media experts focused on ensuring consistent delivery in all markets where GroupM clients do business. At the core of [m]PLATFORM is [mp]ID, a uniquely powerful consumer identifier that unifies data to provide the most comprehensive and detailed picture of an individual consumer.Prior to this role, Brian was the global CEO of Xaxis the world’s largest programmatic audience company.  In this role, he guided overall company strategy, client development and business growth including leading the company’s blockbuster acquisition of Triad Retail Media, the global leader in digital retail media advertising.  Earlier, Brian served as CEO, Americas for Xaxis where he tripled revenue in Xaxis’ largest market, while implementing several ad industry firsts.  Included in his accomplishments are the launch of Xaxis Prime, the first fully programmatic product to guarantee human viewership, and the debut of Xaxis Politics, the first ever solution to use offline voter data for online advertising.  Brian also oversaw the rollout of the company’s direct business in Canada and Mexico as well as the integration of the Xaxis and 24/7 North America operations following the companies’ merger Brian joined Xaxis from the digital publishing industry, where he was the Group Chief Revenue Officer for IDG TechNetwork and IDG Consumer & SMB.  In that role he led sales, marketing, publisher development and programmatic efforts across the more than 550 sites encompassed within the two networks.  He was also instrumental in launching IDG’s Tech Media Exchange, the first private advertising exchange in the technology market, with additional responsibility for overseeing ad product development efforts across display, video and mobile advertising channels.  Brian spent the past three years as chairman of the 4A’s data media management task force creating industry standards across addressable media.Named one of Folio Magazine’s 30 under 30 emerging leaders in the publishing industry, Brian’s experience spans advertising, digital media, publishing, finance and technology. He lives in Connecticut with his wife and two children along with his two dogs.











read bio

Johan Boserup
CEO Trading, GroupM Global

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Johan Boserup
CEO Trading, GroupM Global


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            Johan Boserup is the Global CEO for GroupM Trading. In this role, Johan oversees the media buying operation across WPP’s media agencies. Johan sits on the Global Executive Committee of GroupM.Johan is responsible for leveraging GroupM's market leading scale to enable the four agencies within the group to deliver incremental value to their clients. Johan is also tasked with driving new media trading models, challenging and moving the marketplace, to generate value for our clients.Prior to joining GroupM in June 2013 Johan was Chief Trading & Accountability Officer Worldwide at Omnicom Media Group, responsible for media buying and delivery for OMD and PHD's clients across the globe.Johan was with Omnicom for 17 years – a career that started in Denmark, but quickly expanded to the Nordic region with responsibility for both Trading and Digital Media.In 2005 Johan was appointed European Director of Trading and Accountability at OMG, and in early 2008 the role was expanded to Global.Johan is Danish but has lived in London for many years, with his wife and two boys.
                                                                        










read bio

Harvey Goldhersz
Chief Data Officer & CEO, GroupM Analytics

Linkedin





X







Harvey Goldhersz
Chief Data Officer & CEO, GroupM Analytics


Linkedin



                                                                            In August 2014, Harvey Goldhersz was appointed GroupM Chief Data Officer and CEO of Analytics. In this role he is responsible for ensuring GroupM agencies and their clients have superior access to the data-led insights that can truly transform their media initiatives and performance.Goldhersz joins GroupM from MediaCom, where he has served as Vice Chairman and Worldwide COO for a decade. Prior to 2004, Goldhersz was founder and CEO of MediaCom Digital and CEO of Beyond Interactive, ultimately merging four separate entities – Beyond Interactive, MediaCom Digital, media.com, and Grey E-Media. Under his leadership, MediaCom became the largest integrated interactive media agency network in the industry as ranked independently by RECMA.Prior to his current position, Goldhersz had been CEO of MediaCom North America since 2011.He is based at GroupM’s Headquarters in New York City.
                                                                        












read bio

Tim Cecere
Chief Talent Officer, GroupM Global

Twitter
Linkedin





X







Tim Cecere
Chief Talent Officer, GroupM Global


Twitter
Linkedin



                                                                            Tim is responsible for GroupM’s human resources strategies, practices, and policies for its over 27,500 employees globally. Tim focuses his attention on the continued enhancement of GroupM’s unrivaled talent community, engaging with the best minds in trading, analytics, data and technology around the world. Tim began his career with the New York Times in 1984 and then moved to Newsweek Magazine in 1987. In 1989, Tim joined Ogilvy & Mather Advertising, part of the WPP family. In 2000, Tim was part of the founding team that formed GroupM Worldwide, and his views have been published by media outlets including the Wall Street Journal, Advertising Age and many more.  He has received numerous awards for his professional and charitable work and has been a guest speaker at the AAF Conference, the NYC Center for Communication and multiple colleges and universities.  He is also a musician and a competitive USTA tennis player. Tim has an undergraduate degree from St. John’s University and a Master’s degree Columbia University.
                                                                        

































